Office of Security Executive Summ ary Mission The overall security mission for the Department of Energy is to contribute, in partnership with others, to the Na tion 's secu rity by prote cting A meric a's nu clear d eterre nce cap abili ties a nd cri tical energy infrastructure from a spectrum of diverse threats.
In concert with this mission, the Office of Security develops and promulgates clear and consistent safeguards and security strategies and policy governing the protection of national security and other critical assets entrusted to the Department.
In addition, the Office of Security manages security operations for DOE facilities in the National Capital area.
The Activities of the Office of Security are:
#
Nucle ar Saf eguar ds an d Secu rity Pro gram · · · Safeguards and Security (S
# #
Security Investigations Program Direction
Other D efense Activities/Security Executive Summary
Page 95
FY 200 4 Congressional Budget
The Nuclear Safeguards and Security (S
#
Nonproliferation and National Security Institute's (NNSI) primary mission is to train personnel throughout the DOE complex, as well as other federal, state, local and international agencies that are involved in the protection of national security assets.
NNSI has grown from one academy focused on S
NNSI is planned to transition from a DOE Training Center of Excellence into a college/university level, degree-granting institution.
Nuclear Materials Management and Safeguards System (NMMSS) to track and analyze U.S. nuclear materials activity using data from various other databases.
Information Security to support the Department in areas of classified matter protection and control, technical security, operations security, and foreign ownership, control or influence of private companies.
Security Education Briefings and Awareness Training to communicate changes in security policies and procedures.
Personnel Security to evaluate, review, and develop guidance and documents for use in assessing the Personnel Security Assurance program as it relates to the medical, psychological, legal, security, and management areas.
Headquarters Security to protect personnel, Government property and classified matter at Headquarters buildings.
Foreign Visits and Assignments program to manage the granting of access to foreign nationals to DOE Federal and contractor facilities.
Foreign Travel Managem ent S ystem to appro ve, co ntrol and rep ort DO E-wid e offi cial f oreign travel.
# #
# #
# # #
During FY 2002, the DOE Energy Operations Center and the Continuity of Operations/Continuity of Government program was transferred to the Office of Security from the National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA).
Activities for these function are:
# # #
Manage the DOE HQ Watch Office, and the DOE Operations Center at Forrestal and the Alternate Operations Center at Germantown.
Maintain the 24-hour single point-of-contact for Departmental notifications, including reports of unusual occurrences, incidents, and emergencies at DOE sites/facilities.
Serve as the HQ focal point for DOE Emergency response.
Other D efense Activities/Security Executive Summary
Page 96
FY 200 4 Congressional Budget
# # # # # #
Manage, conduct and facilitate HQ events or incident notifications.
Operate specialized communication and information processing systems equipment in support of operations.
Maintain and/or support program office storage of normal, contingency and emergency operations reference materials in the DOE Operations Center.
Provi de man agement and di recti on for HQ Eme rgency Resp onse P lan tr ainin g. Develop and maintain plans, policies and procedures to notify appropriate individuals and entities in time-sensitive, event-driven situations.
Manage, operate and maintain the Department's Emergency Communications Network, providing secure and non-secure voice, video and data links with satellite backup to Departmental Operations/Field Offices, national laboratories, key facilities, other select Federal agencies, and select foreign nations.
Assure DOE has the capability to continue essential functions across the spectrum of potential emergencies.
Establish and manage the Department's Continuity of Operations Program (COOP), ensuring a continual high level of readiness.
Establish and manage the Departmental Continuity of Government Program (COG).
Provide staffing and operational support to the National Emergency Management Team, if required.
Serve as the Department's Chief Infrastructure Assurance Officer responsible for protecting internal physical assets.
#
#
#
Technology and Systems Development programs: Funds technology solutions in material control and accounting and physical security to enhance our ability to defend against threats to the Department's nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and key Department assets and personnel.
Classification/Declassification: Develops Government-wide and Department-wide policies and guidance to identify which nuclear weapon information warrants protection in the interest of national security, conducts declassification reviews and audits of classified documents, and provides training programs throughout the Government to ensure consistent protection of the most sensitive information.
Security Investigations: Funds background investigations for all DOE federal employees and contractors who, in the performance of their official duties, require access authorizations for Restricted Data, National Security Information, or certain quantities of special nuclear material.
Other D efense Activities/Security Executive Summary
Page 97
FY 200 4 Congressional Budget
Program Direction: Provides Federal and support-service contract personnel required at DOE Headquarters and New Brunswick Laboratory to carry out the program's mission in a cost effective manner.
The budget request specifically reflects support for the Nuclear Safeguards and Security program, the Security Investigations program, Executive Protection for the Secretary of Energy and other principals, Resource Management and the Office of the Director.
Program Strategic Performance Goals CM5: Reduce adverse security incidents, worker injuries, and environmental releases through policy devel opmen t, cou nteri ntell igence, intel ligenc e, and overs ight o f the N ation 's ener gy infrastructure, nuclear weapons, materials, facilities, and information assets.
This strategic objective is supported by the Program Strategic Performance Goals that follow: CM5-1: Develop policies and strategies to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to the Department of Energy (DOE), deploy technological solutions to enhance security, protect Headquarters personnel and facilities, and provide other specialized security activities.
Performance Indicators Effective, clear, and comprehensive security strategies and policies for DOE-wide application to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to DOE.
A secure work environment for Headquarters facilities in the national capital area.
Innovative technological solutions resolving validated safeguards and security vulnerabilities to assist DOE facilities in deploying appropriate protection measures for critical assets as defined in the DOE Design Basis Threat.
Specialized activities to protect Departmental facilities, nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and personnel.
Major Changes: In FY 2002, the Office of the Chief Information Officer and their functions and funding separated from th e Office of S ecurit y. Also, Operations Support, consisting of the DOE Operations Center and the functions for the Continuity of Operations/Continuity of Government Program were transferred to Office of Security.
Other D efense Activities/Security Executive Summary
Page 98
FY 200 4 Congressional Budget
Fun ding P rofile (dollar s in thousan ds) Other D efense Activities - Secur ity Nucle ar Safe guards and Sec urity S
Techn ology and System s Dev elopm ent. . . .
Classification/Declassification . . . . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, N uclear S afegua rds and Secur ity . . .
Security Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Program Direction . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, S ecurity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Use of Prior Year Balances . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Security Charge for Reimbursable Work . . .
Total, S ecurity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Additional net budget authority to cover the cost of fully accruing retirement (non-add) . . . .
50,133 25,970 17,115 93,218 44,927 50,286 188,431 -4,550 -712 183,169 (1,706) 58,753 22,557 17,474 98,784 45,870 52,046 196,700 0 -712 195,988 (1,703) 66,315 20,924 17,474 104,713 54,554 52,490 211,757 0 -712 211,045 (2,168) +7,562 -1,633 +0 +5,929 +8,684 +444 +15,057 +0 +0 +15,057 (+465) +11.4% -7.2% +0.0% +6.0% +18.9% +0.9% +7.7% 0 0 +7.7% (+27.3%) FY 2002 Com parable Appropriation FY 2003 Request FY 2004 Request
$ Change
% Change
Public Law Authorizations: P.L. 83-703, "Atomic Energy Act of 1954" P.L. 95-242, "Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act of 1978" P.L. 103.62, "Government Performance and Results Act of 1993"
Other D efense Activities/Security Executive Summary
Page 99
FY 200 4 Congressional Budget
Funding by Sitea (dollars in thousands) Oth er D efe nse Activities - Sec urity Albuquerque Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . .
Los Alamos N ational Lab . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Sandia National Labs . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Pantex . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Albuquerque Operations Office . . . . . .
Chicago Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Argonne National Lab . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
New Brunswick Lab . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Chicago Operations Office . . . . . . . . . .
Idaho Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Nevada Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Oak Ridge Operations Office ............
FY 2002 32,184 5,416 10,100 271 47,971 511 670 6,031 7,212 1,915 7,590 2,263 2,626 25 133 675 5,722 8,952 5,497 14,449 6,569 0 4,924 92,079 188,431 FY 2003 34,883 5,490 10,741 25 51,139 454 750 6,690 7,894 1,796 8,707 2,364 2,715 0 318 685 6,082 9,434 3,238 12,672 4,958 20 5,619 97,813 196,700 FY 2004 41,942 5,520 9,978 25 57,465 613 750 7,779 9,142 1,859 9,132 2,507 1,557 0 308 685 5,057 10,144 2,608 12,752 4,494 20 7,140 104,696 211,757 $ Change +7,059 +30 -763 +0 +6,326 +159 +0 +1,089 +1,248 +63 +425 +143 -1,158 +0 -10 +0 -1,025 +710 -630 +80 -464 +0 +1,521 +6,883 +15,057 % Change +20.2% +0.5% -7.1% +0.0% +12.4% +35.0% +0.0% +16.3% +15.8% +3.5% +4.9% +6.0% -42.7% +0.0% -3.1% +0.0% -16.9% +7.5% -19.5% +0.6% -9.4% +0.0% +27.1% +7.0% +7.7%
BW XT/Y-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Bech tel Jaco bs ETTP . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Office of Scientific and Tech Information . . .
Oak Ridge Institute of Science 
Oakland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Lawrence Livermore National Lab . . . . . . . .
Total, Oakland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . .
Richland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Rocky Flats Area Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Savannah River Operations Office . . . . . . . . .
W ashington H eadqua rters . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Su btota l, Sec urity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
On Decem ber 20, 2002, the National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA) disestablished the Albuquerque, Oakland, and Nevada Operations Offices, renamed existing area offices as site offices, es tab lish ed a n ew Ne va da Site O ffic e, a nd es tab lish ed a s ing le N N SA Se rvic e C en ter to b e lo ca ted in Albuquerque.
Other aspects of the NNSA organizational changes will be phased in and consolidation of the Service Center in Albuquerque will be completed by September 30, 2004.
For budget display purp ose s, D OE is disp laying no n-N NS A bu dge ts by site in the tra ditiona l pre-N NS A or gan izationa l form at.
Other D efense Activities/Security Executive Summary FY 200 4 Congressional Budget
a
Page 100
(dollars in thousands) Oth er D efe nse Activities - Sec urity Use of Prior Year Balances . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Security charge against reimb ursable work To tal, Sec urity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
FY 2002 -4,550 -712 183,169 FY 2003 +0 -712 195,988 FY 2004 +0 -712 211,045 $ Change +0 +0 +15,057 % Change +0.0% +0.0% +7.7%
Federal Staffing Estimates (whole FTEs) Other Defense Activities Chicago Operations Office FTEs . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Headquarters Security FTEs . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
To tal, Full T im e Eq uivalen ts . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
FY 2002 40 241 281 FY 2003 40 252 292 FY 2004 40 254 294
Other D efense Activities/Security Executive Summary
Page 101
FY 200 4 Congressional Budget
Page 102
Nuclear Safeguards and Security Program Mission Provide domestic Nuclear Safeguards and Security for the protection of nuclear weapons, nuclear materials, nuclear facilities, and classified and unclassified information against theft, sabotage, espionage, terrorist activities, or any loss or unauthorized disclosure that could endanger our National Security or disrupt operations.
Physical Security provides cost-effective plans, policies, and technical solutions to ensure that nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and key Department facilities and personnel are adequately protected from evolving threats.
The Nonproliferation and National Security Institute is a national asset for education, training, support services and professional development throughout not only the Department of Energy (DOE), but also other federal, state, local and international agencies.
The Nuclear Materials Accountability Systems maintain real-time, reliable, and complete information on DOE nuclear materials that are subject to special control and inventory procedures.
Foreign Visits, Assignments, and Travel provides and implements Departmental foreign interactions policy by managing two DOE-wide databases to control, track, analyze, and approve the suitability of granting access by foreign nations to DOE sites; and to control, track, approve, and account for official foreign travel on behalf of DOE.
The Office of Operations Support directs the DOE Operations Centers, providing support to Headquarters emergency response operations and maintains and operates the Department's Emergency Communications Network (ECN).
The Office also maintains a comprehensive program to ensure continuity of essential Departmental functions under all contingencies in accordance with Presidential Decision Directive 67, "Enduring Constitutional Government and Continuity of Government Operations."
Classification/Declassification prevents adversaries from acquiring weapons of mass destruction or damaging the nation's energy infrastructure.
This is accomplished by developing policies to identify information warranting protection or control in the interest of national security; by reviewing documents using these policies before they are made available to the public, to ensure that no classified or controlled information is compromised; and by examining documents that have already been made available to the public, to ensure that if they contain classified/controlled information, they are withdrawn and not further disseminated.
Protection of government property, classified matter, and personnel is provided to the National Capital area through the Headquarters Security program.
Program Strategic Perform ance Goals CM5-1: Develop policies and strategies to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to DOE, deploy technological solutions to enhance security, protect Headquarters personnel and facilities, and provide other specialized security activities.
Performance Indicators # Effective, clear, and comprehensive security strategies and policies for DOE-wide application to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to DOE.
# A secure work environment for Headquarters facilities in the national capital area.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 103
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
# Innovative technological solutions resolving validated safeguards and security vulnerabilities to assist DOE facilities in deploying appropriate protection measures for critical assets as defined in the DOE Design Basis Threat.
# Specialized activities to protect Departmental facilities, nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and personnel.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 104
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Significant Accomplishments and Program Shifts # The development of advanced safeguards and security technologies has resulted in the modernization of numerous protective measures for the Department, as well as the ability to mitigate new and emerging threats that otherwise represent critical vulnerabilities.
Technology and Systems Development Accomplishments are: · Rel ease d Ad vers ary Timeline Analysis System (ATLAS) Version 2.0, providing users the ability to identify critical protection elements and perform collusion analyses; demonstrated the techniques required to chemically harden existing entry control points.
· Performance tested physical security equipment against the DOE Design Basis Threat and emerging threats to make sound procurement decisions and provide quality performance data for security system modeling tools.
· Transferred the Access Delay Command and Control System to a commercial vendor to allow applications of "high penalty" activated barriers with a very secure and reliable control system.
· Delivered an emergency egress radiation system that provides isotopic identification screening at secure/emergency exit points to prevent the unauthorized removal of special nuclear materials.
· Provided a low-cost, safe chemical tagging system to detect the theft or unauthorized removal of high value or sensitive items at facility portals.
· Developed a new, rapid, automated software system for determining accurate uranium and plutonium quantities that remains in pipes and ducts in DOE facilities.
This capability provides a rapid determination if buildings are below criticality limits as well as reduce costs associated with decontaminating and decommissioning buildings.
· Demonstrated a technique for implementing gamma-ray spectroscopic imaging on-line in a nuclear facility for continuous inventory of plutonium in an operating process, significantly reducing shut-down time and operator radiation exposure.
· Provided a measurement capability to accurately measure Plutonium-238 (Pu-238) in Pu samples with elevated levels of Pu-238 which is currently unmeasurable; developed a neutron imaging technique for very-dense heterogeneous uranium and plutonium materials, saving the time and effort required to use alternative approaches as well as reduce inventory differences.
· Delivered an in-vault plutonium mass confirmation system that operates on battery power, eliminating the need to make separate measurements using gamma spectrometers, calorimeters and/or coincidence counters for Pu samples.
# Since 9/11/01, the DOE Nonproliferation and National Security Institute (NNSI) doubled its training capacity due to increased requirements of the protective force, Homeland Security and countering terrorism.
Firing range and classroom instruction are at 100% of maximum capacity.
Protective force student attendance is up 75% from FY 2001.
In FY 2002 NNSI serviced, in classroom and in a field environment, over 18,000 individuals worldwide.
In the preceding twelve months, NNSI trained an additional 280 new Basic Security Police Officers for DOE, 400 FBI agents in hazardous materials response, 1,025 foreign national police officers for the Department of State, and assisted DOE Headquarters with Second Line of Defense initiatives in Russia and the Former Soviet Union states.
Finally, the firing ranges must be maintained or they will be subject to being closed due to safety and environmental problems.
The government has a $40 million investment in these training programs.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 105
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
# The Classification/Declassification Review Program continues to ensure that publically released government documents do not contain classified or controlled information that would assist adversaries in acquiring weapons of mass destruction or damaging the nation's energy infrastructure.
This is accomplished by reviewing documents before they are made available to the public, to ensure that no classified or controlled information is compromised; and by examining documents that have already been made available to the public, to ensure that if they contain classified/ controlled information, they are withdrawn and not further disseminated.
In FY 200 2 DO E wi ll r evi ew ap pro xim ate ly 114,000 pages that include: Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) requests; Executive Order (E.O.)12958, Section 3.6, Mandatory Review; litigation discovery responses; as well as newly written DOE documents.
Additionally, DOE will: (1) audit approximately 6,000,000 pages of historical documents potentially embedded with Restricted Data and Formerly Restricted Data that were declassified by other government agencies under E.O. 12958, section 3.4 before the page-by-page review requirement of P.L. 105-261 was enacted; and (2) quality control examine another 1,800,000 pages of historical documents that were declassified after the page-by-page review requirement of P.L. 105-261 was enacted.
Finally, DOE will examine over 500,000 pages of its own historical records for declassification under E.O. 12958.
Section 3.4.
From these examinations, it is expected that in FY 2002 DOE will find that approximately one half of these documents (from the FOIA requests, mandatory review, litigation discovery responses, and newly written DOE documents) contain in part classified and controlled information.
This information will be saved from compromise.
Additionally, it is expected that DOE will identify approximately 1,000 pages of RD and FRD inadvertently compromised by other government agencies under E.O. 12958, section 3.4; and DOE will be assessing the resulting damage to national security.
The E.O. 12958, section 3.4 compromises are reported quarterly to the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs and to the Congress.
# The DOE Information Security program continues to provide support to the Department in analyzing and deterring major incidents involving the compromise of classified information.
This includes expansion of the computer forensics capability to support investigations and prosecutions of unauthorized disclosures of classified information; enhancement of the e-Foreign Ownership, Control, or Influence (e-FOCI) registration and analysis capability; improvement to the security incid ent tr ackin g and an alysis capab ilit y (ITAC); and expansion of the Operations Security and Technical Surveillance Countermeasures program tools.
# The Office of Security enhanced DOE's management of foreign interactions during FY 2002 by adding two international programs to the existing program for granting and controlling access to DOE sites by foreign nationals.
These include the transfer of Official Foreign Travel Policy and the Foreign Travel Management System functions from the Office of the Chief Financial Officer, and the transfer of the DOE Exchange Visitor Program from the Office of Policy and International Affairs.
These transfers, although in process prior to the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks, provide the Office of Security the opportunity to improve management and control of the security-related aspects of DOE's foreign interactions, and to assume a leadership role in DOE's Homeland Security responsibilities.
The Foreign Interactions Traini ng Acad emy (FITA) became operational, delivering training to enhance program effectiveness in all aspects of foreign visits, assignments, and travel throughout the DOE complex.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 106
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
# Responsibility for the funding of costs associated with radioactive waste processing for the New Brunswick Laboratory has been transferred from the Office of Science to the Office of Security in FY 2003.
# The Office of Headquarters Security Operations continues to provide a safe and secure working environment for Departmental employees and protect classified and sensitive unclassified informati on through a variety of enhan ced securit y measures.
Add itional fu nding provi ded through the Fiscal Year 2002 Supplemental Appropriation supported the introduction of facility upgrades related to access control, alarm and video surveillance and the deployment of uniformed security personnel.
Modifications to the facility air handling system allows better control in the event of an emergency shutdown and the installation of public address systems within the facilities is a crucial upgrade for aging edifices.
The ability of the program to monitor attempts to circumvent access controls has been improved through additional armed patrols, technical monitoring to detect explosive materials and vehicle pop-up barriers, bollards and reinforcements to existing property boundaries.
The Office completed 1,701 clearance actions, processed 6,689 classified visits and made access eligibility recommendations on 415 Sensitive Compartmented Information cases.
The Headquarters Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) Team conducted over 40 services in direct support of Capitol Hill, the Office of the Secretary and the Office of the Administrator, NNSA.
# In FY 2002, the DOE Operations Center was transferred from the U.S. Department of Energy's Office of Emergency Operations, budgeted under the Weapons Activities appropriation, to the Office of Security's Operations Support Program.
# DOE's Continuity of Government (COG) and Continuity of Operations (COOP) programs was transferred from DOE's Office of Emergency Operations to the Office of Security.
# The Departmental COG program provides staff and operational support 24 hours a day, 7 days a week to the National Emergency team in support of the Nation's national security program, and liaison to the White House Military Office.
The COOP program is involved in evaluating and determining the Department's obligations for continuation of essential Federal government operations.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 107
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Funding Profile (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Comparable Appropriation Nuclear Saf eguards and S ecurity Operational Support . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Technology and Systems Development . . . .
Classification/Declassification Resources . . .
Total, Nuclear Saf eguards and S ecurity .....
50,133 25,970 17,115 93,218 abc
FY 2003 Request 58,753 c
FY 2004 Request 66,315 20,924 17,474 104,713
$ Change +7,562 -1,633 0 +5,929
$ Change +12.9% -7.2% 0.0% +6.0%
22,557 17,474 98,784
Public Law Authorizations: P.L. 83-703, "Atomic Energy Act of 1954" P.L. 95-242, "Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act of 1978" P.L. 103.62, "Government Performance and Results Act of 1993"
Reflec ts incre ase of $3 ,500 ,000 for su pplem enta l fund ing of whic h $1, 300 ,000 is for extr a roving force security patrols, $700,000 for a public address system, $500,000 to replac e the alarm system at the Forrestal and Germ antown facilities, and $1,000,000 for deployment of the civilian Biological Aerosol Sentry and Information System (BA SIS).
Reflec ts com parability adjus tmen t to transfer $1,000,000 of supplemental funding in support of BASIS to the Weapons Activities Nuclear Incidence Response in NNSA.
Reflec ts comparability adjustment to transfer $1,143,000 to the Office of the Chief In formation Officer in support of the Special Facilities/Commu nications Center.
Reflects comparability adjustment to transfer $428,000 in FY 2002 and $437,000 in FY 2003 from the Office o f Science for costs associated with radioactive waste processing for the New Brunswick Laboratory.
Also reflects comparability adjustment to transfer $7,185,000 in FY 2002 and $7,245,000 in FY 2003 from DOE/NNSA t o the Offic e of S ecu rity for s upp ort of the D OE Ope ration s Ce nter a nd D OE 's Continuity of Government and Continuity of Operations Programs.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security c b
a
Page 108
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Funding by Site
a
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Albuquerque Operations Office Los Alamos National Laboratory . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Sandia National Laboratories . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Pantex . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
.. . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Albuquerque Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, Albuquerque Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Chicago Operations Office Argonne National Laboratory . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
New Brunsw ick Laboratory .......................
Subtotal, Chicago Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Idaho Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Nevada Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Oak Ridge Operations Office Oak Ridge Operations Office, Y-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Oak Ridge Operations Office, Bechtel Jacobs . . . . . . . .
Oak Ridge Operations Office .....................
Office of Scientific and Technical Information . . . . . . . . .
Oak Ridge Institute for Science and Education . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, Oak Ridge Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Richland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Rocky Flats Area Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Oakland Operations Office Oakland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Lawrence Livermore Laboratory . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, Oakland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Savannah R iver Site . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
W ashington Headquarters . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Nuclear Saf eguards and S ecurity ...............
3,936 5,497 9,433 1,672 40,441 93,218 4,362 3,238 7,600 1,579 44,357 98,784 4,432 2,608 7,040 2,480 51,417 104,713 +70 -630 -560 +901 +7,060 +5,929 +1.6% -19.5% -7.4% +57.1% +15.9% +6.0% 2,626 25 75 133 500 3,359 4,762 0 2,715 0 75 318 500 3,608 3,025 20 1,557 0 75 308 500 2,440 2,425 20 -1,158 0 0 -10 0 -1,168 -600 0 -42.7% 0.0% 0.0% -3.1% 0.0% -32.4% -19.8% 0.0% 670 428 1,098 1,182 5,491 750 937 1,687 1,162 6,976 750 1,546 2,296 1,212 7,211 0 +609 +609 +50 +235 0.0% +65.0% +36.1% +4.3% +3.4% 5,416 10,100 271 9,993 25,780 5,490 10,741 25 12,514 28,770 5,520 9,978 25 12,649 28,172 +30 -763 0 +135 -598 +0.5% -7.1% 0.0% +1.1% -2.1% FY 2003 FY 2004 $ Change % Change
On December 20, 2002, the National Nuclea r Sec urity Administration (NNSA) disestablished the Albuquerque, Oakland, and Nevada Operations Offices, renamed existing area offices as site offices, established a new N evada S ite Office, a nd esta blished a s ingle N NSA Serv ice C ente r to be locat ed in Albuquerque.
Other aspects of the NNSA organization chang es will be ph ased in and consolidation of the Service Center in Albuquerque will be completed by September 30, 2004.
For budget display purposes, DOE is displaying n on-NN SA bud gets by site in th e traditional pr e-NN SA org anizational fo rma t.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
a
Page 109
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Site Description Los Alamos National Laboratory Work at Los Alamos National Laboratory (LANL) is designed to address current, evolving, and future needs, primarily in Materials Control and Accounting (MC
MC
LANL also develops standards for special nuclear materials to calibrate instruments around the complex.
Other activities include evaluating commercial measurement systems and the development of MC
Support is also provided to the Classification and Declassification program through development of Headquarters classification guidance for all classification areas: weapons, material production, and material disposition; and review and evaluation of current state-of-the-art unclassified computer codes and gaseous diffusion technologies for modification in existing classification policy and guidance.
Sandia National Laboratories, Albuquer que (SNLA) Sandia focuses on development of technologies and systems required to protect the Department from catastrophic consequences such as use of nuclear energy for malevolent purposes or the erosion of national security secrets through theft or diversion of classified materials or information.
Technical assistance is provided for assessment of site vulnerability analysis and site safeguards and security plans.
The technology development program focuses on physical security technologies to protect and secure the DOE complex.
Activities include developing countermeasures for security equipment vulnerabilities.
Sandia will performance test: interior and exterior sensors; alarm communications; access delay; and entry control systems to provide sound acquisition advice to DOE facilities and for inclusion into vul nera bil ity a nal ysis sof twa re. S and ia w ill als o up dat e th e Ad vers ary Timeline Analysis Software to more accurately and realistically model DOE security systems and analyze them for vulnerabilities.
Sandia provides technical support to develop Headquarters classification guidance covering the following a reas: weapon s, material productio n, material disposit ion, techn ology, chem/bio, and intelligence issues; and a Russian unclassified (or sensitive unclassified) classification guidance on nuclear weapons.
Pantex Support is provided to the Classification and Declassification program for development of classification guides and the Guidance Streamlining Initiative which is an effort to improve the accuracy, clarity, and content of guidance policy.
Albuquerque Operations Office/Nonproliferation and National Security Institute The Nonproliferation and National Security Institute (NNSI), which includes the Central Training Academy, is located in Albuquerque, New Mexico, and reports to the Office of Security at Headquarters.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 110
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
NNSI was estab lished to b e the DOE lead er in the dev elopment o f standardi zed state- of-the art t raining technology and for integrating comprehensive and professional executed training, education, and vocational services.
Over the past several years, NNSI has grown from one academy focused on Safeguards and Security to five academies providing training and education services and support in response to national requirements:
# # # # #
Safeguards and Security Central Training Academy Counterintelligence Training Academy Foreign Interaction Training Academy Emergency Operations Training Academy Arms Control and Nonproliferation Academy
Since the September 11 attacks, NNSI is actively involved in conducting DOE training and education for a major component of the Homeland Defense effort.
This includes: identifying an d counterin g foreign intelligence threats; providing value-added defensive counterintelligence; and conducting employee selfdefense briefings, de-briefings, and specific awareness training about national security issues.
Albuquerque Operations Office The Classification and Declassification program receives support in developing classification guidance in the classification areas of weapons, material production, material disposition, chem/bio, and intelligence and continues the Guidance Streamlining Initiative which is an effort to improve the accuracy, clarity, and content of guidance policy..
Argonne National Laboratory Argonne supports tasks associated with the Foreign Ownership, Control, or Influence (FOCI) program facilitat ing an e-FOCI dat abase of inf ormation t hat ensures more thoro ugh DOE inves tigation o f foreign ownership, control or influence on contracts involving classified information of special nuclear materials, including training to field sites transitioning to the use of electronic FOCI submissions.
New Brunsw ick Laboratory The New Brunswick Laboratory at Argonne, Illinois, is the U.S. Government's nuclear material measurements and standards laboratory and is a Federal Center of Excellence in nuclear material measurement science.
It provides and maintains an internationally compatible nuclear material reference base for domestic and international measurements for nuclear material accountability, proliferation monitoring, waste management and environmental restoration activities, and for health/safety activities.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 111
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Idaho Nation al Engineering an d Environmental Laboratory (INEEL) INEEL provides technical assistance and engineering support for: review and evaluation of security design requirements; engineering support for validation, justification, and site safeguards and security plan reviews; development and refinement of security design criteria; and day-to-day technical support of the Headquarters security alarm and access control system.
Nevada Operations Office Activities conducted at the Remote Sensing Laboratory and the Special Techn olo gies Labo rat ory focus on development of advanced physical security technologies.
To assist protective force personnel, efforts include developing technologies such as a command and control system to monitor the status of security incidents.
The maintenance, upgrade, and expansion of the Emergency Communications Network (ECN), to include a redundant capability for ECN-related operations, is supported at Nevada.
Oak Ridge, BWXT, Y-12 At Oak Ridge, the technology development program provides the physical security, material control, and accounting support needed to protect nuclear weapons, nuclear material, classified information, and other vital DOE assets (nonnuclear and unclassified).
Expertise is provided in the document Classification and Declassification program for the Guidance Streamlining Initiative through developing a method to manage classification topics and related classification guidance policy.
Oak Ridge National Laborato ry (ORNL), UT-Battelle LLC ORNL support is provided to the classification/declassification program in the review and evaluation of classification policy relating to gaseous diffusion.
Oak Ridge Operations Office Oak Ridge Operations Office, provides support to the Classification and Declassification program through document declassification review for information requested under the Energy Employees Occupational Illness Compensation Program and Environment, Safety, and Health civil suits.
Oak Ridge Institute for Science 
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 112
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Richland Operations Office, Battelle Memorial Institute/Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) PNNL is a center of excellence for information security policy and technical support.
The Information Security Resource Center (ISRC), provides subject matter experts in the Information Security (IS), subtopical areas of Classified Matter Protection and Control, Technical Surveillance Countermeasures, Operations Security, and classified/unclassified computer security policy.
PNNL also provides subject matter experts in the Program Planning and Management (PPM) subtopical areas of facility approvals and surveys, and foreign ownership control or influence, Site Safeguards and Security Plans, and Master Site Security Plans and performance testing.
These subject matter experts provide support to quality panel working groups in the PPM and IS areas.
Specific tools developed and enhanced by PNNL for the IS topical area include: data visualization, an OPSEC collection and analysis tool (Mozart), which is being used to support threat development and reviews of Departmental web sites available to the public, and the Secure Safe Product, an awareness tool to remind individuals when there security containers are in the open position.
The Classification and Declassification program is supported through development of Headquarters classification guidance covering the following: weapons, material production, material disposit ion, techn ology, chem/bio, intelligence, and the guidance streamlining initiative which is an effort to improve the accuracy, clarity, and content of classification guidance policy.
Richland Operations Office, Fluor-Daniel Hanford Provides Hanford-based field expertise, technical support and assistance for the review, update and consolidation of safeguards and security orders, policies, and field guidance.
Rocky Flats Area Office The Classification and Declassification program receives support in developing classification guidance in the classification areas of weapons, material production, material disposition, chem/bio, and intelligence.
Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory (LLNL) The LLNL technology development program focuses on physical security, Material Control and Accounting (MC
Physical security activities focus on expanding the ability of current alarm communication and access control systems to interact more effectively during an emergency situation (e.g., fire protection, radiological release monitoring).
MC
The Classification and Declassification program is supported through development and streamlining of classification guidance.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 113
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Oakland Operations Office Oakland supports the Nuclear Materials Management and Safeguards System which tracks and analyzes U.S. foreign nuclear activity.
The Class ification and Declass ification program is s upported t hrough development of classification guidance in the areas of weapons, material production, material disposition, chem/bio, and intelligence; continuing the Guidance Streamlining Initiative; and review and analysis of content and proliferation potential of certain nuclear weapons-related information available in the public domain.
Savannah River Site Work at Savannah River supports MC
This technology will allow for greater reliability, efficiency, and cost savings through increased standardization and use of advanced software technologies.
Office of Scientific and Technical Information Support is provided for the Classification and Declassification program by improving the access capability to DOE's OpenNet data base and maintaining and enhancing the thesaurus and dictionary for the automated classification guidance system.
Washington Headquarters The Headquarters program for Nuclear Safeguards and Security has responsibility for management and implementation of the:
# Headquarters Security Police Force; # Safeguards and Security Information Management System (SSIMS) database; # DOE Computer Forensics Laboratory supporting inquiries into unauthorized disclosures of classified information;
# Maintenance and upgrade of alarm systems, access control systems, related computer equipment; and protective force equipment;
# DOE Operations Center support service contractors and the maintenance and expansion of communications systems connecting the DOE complex and selected Federal agencies which is essential for rapid Departmental response(s) to emergencies that may occur within the DOE complex, or outside the continental United States.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 114
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
# DOE's share of the COOP/COG facility rent, maintenance, and communications needs.
# Classifying and declassifying nuclear weapons-related technology (known as Restricted Data), ensuring that policies provide the public access to information necessary for an informed discussion of DOE's nuclear weapons program while continuing to support the paramount objective of protecting information from strategic adversaries, proliferants or potential proliferants, and terrorists.
Specific areas covered are: · Devel op Gov ernme nt-wi de Res trict ed Dat a and D OE-wi de Nat ional Secur ity Info rmati on (NS I) program policies; and detailed classification guidance, which specifically identifies information requ iri ng pr ote cti on i n th e in ter est of n ati ona l se curi ty; · Review documents to classify information that still warrants protection and declassify information that is no longer sensitive; · Train personnel both within DOE and throughout the Government to recognize Restricted Data information and to ensure that it is properly classified to prevent its inadvertent release; · Assess DOE and other-agency classification and declassification programs to ensure policies and procedures are consistently applied; and · Develop state-of-the-art technology to make the classification and declassification process more efficient and effective.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security
Page 115
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Page 116
Operational Support Mission Supporting Goals and Objectives Safeguards and Security (S
This support provides for the overall improvement of S
Subprogram activitie s in this s ection of t he budget in clude the fo llowing:
# The Nonproliferation and National Security Institute (NNSI) was established to be the DOE leader in the development of standardized state-of-the art training technology and for integrating comprehensive and professional executed training, education, and vocational services.
Over the past several years NNSI has grown from one academy focused on Safeguards and Security to five academies providing training and education services and support in response to national requirements.
The academies are: · · · · · Safeguards and Security Central Training Academy Counterintelligence Training Academy Foreign Interaction Training Academy Emergency Operations Training Academy Arms Control and Nonproliferation Academy
NNSI uses bot h traditio nal and dis tance learni ng technolo gies to prov ide onsite and facilit y training, thereby ensuring that DOE maintains a well-trained workforce to protect the nation's vital nuclear and energy interests against espionage, sabotage or theft.
NNSI includes a premier government television broadcast studio, computer-based training, interactive audio/video training, and correspondence courses.
The NNSI's Central Training Academy (CTA) assesses security and safeguards field training needs, develops training courses to meet those needs, and certifies DOE/NNSA training programs.
NNSI, through the CTA and its other Academies, has reached over 18,000 students worldwide yearly.
# Nuclear Mat erials Acco untabili ty Systems supports the Office of Plutonium, Uranium, and Special Materials Inventory and the Nuclear Materials Management and Safeguards Systems (NMMSS).
NMMSS tracks and analyzes U.S. and foreign nuclear material activity using data from the Local Area Network Material Accounting System (LANMAS) and other site systems.
# Information Security provides support Department-wide in the areas of classified matter protection and control; technical security; operations security; and foreign ownership, control or influence.
The information security activities provide a capability to evaluate proposed security measures within the Department's complex environment.
The Information Security Resource Center (ISRC) incorporates technical expertise and professional development training to ensure that the five disciplines of information security function are integrated in a cohesive manner.
The Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) program, which is one of the five disciplines, ensures and enhances the Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Page 117
security provided for Departmental facilities and programs in the greater Washington, D.C. area.
The Information Security Protection Program provides technical expertise, assistance, and awareness training for the information security disciplines.
The information security program also provides matrixed support to various Departmental programs, such as the critical infrastructure program, the counterterrorism/counterintelligence program, and the classified/unclassified computer security policy.
# Safeguards and Security Awareness implements directives to reflect changing policies and procedures and exchanges information through the participation in security education workshops and meetings.
# Personnel Security develops policy and associated guidance documents for use in evaluating the Personnel Security Assurance Program (PSAP) as it relates to the medical, psychological, legal, security, and management areas.
Conducts research and prepares technical documentation to support the Personnel Security activities.
Provides technical assistance and operational support to the Personnel Security progra m manager to e valuate th e current st atus of sci ence and tech nology advances as it relates to the PSAP.
# The Headquarters Security Police Force provides security for the protection of Government property, classified matter, and personnel at headquarters facilities.
# Additional Support provides: · The Safeguards and Security Information Management System (SSIMS) tracks and reports classified S
SSIMS allows the Security Policy staff to conduct continuous reviews of the security measures in place at DOE/contractor facilities, ensuring compliance with DOE policy requirements and monitoring the effectiveness of Departmental policy involving the protection of national security assets.
SSIMS funding will maintain the current database information system detailing facility findings, ratings, general operational status, and enhance the system's capability to meet changes in Departmental policy.
· Replacement and/or upgrade of test and measurement equipment at the New Brunswick Laboratory to maintain a state-of-the-art measurement capability.
· Headquarters security upgrades such as vehicle inspection scanning devices, security screening equipment, TV monitoring, and radiation/chemical/biological detection devices.
· Headquarters support and corrective/preventive maintenance of the Security Alarm and Access Control Systems, x-ray machines, magnetometers, and executive protection force radio systems.
· Complete detection and assessment capabilities of nuclear/biological/chemical agents across the DOE , including testing and implementation of chemical protection mask communication equipment.
· Support for Phase II implementation of the revised DOE standard vulnerability assessment tool suite.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 118
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
# Foreign Visits, Assignments, and Travel Program (FVAT) develops policies and implements operationa l activiti es associat ed with the security dime nsions of D OE's intera ctions wit h foreign nationals visiting or assigned to DOE sites; foreign nationals sponsored by DOE for scientific, technical, or administrative assignments with DOE programs; and DOE-sponsored official fore ign travel in s upport of D OE program ob jectives.
This DOE-wi de responsi bility inclu des foreign nationals seeking access to DOE federal and contractor (including National Laboratories) facilities to perform classified or unclassified work, and DOE personnel, including foreign national employees, traveling outside of the United States on official business for the Department.
These responsibilities are supported by two DOE-wide, web-based information systems that receive requests for foreign national access approvals and DOE Official Foreign Travel approvals.
These systems incorporate an internal management control process that documents the review of these requests within the context of program requirements, security issues, and DOE policy; status of actions ta ken to appro ve or deny these requests; and account s for the in volvement of foreign nationals with DOE personnel and DOE staff involved in official foreign travel.
# The DOE Operations Center serves as the HQ focal point for DOE emergency response; carries out Departmental emergency management procedures and requirements; and ensures DOE maintains a comprehensive emergency management and operations capability.
In support of this mission, the Operations Center will manage the Emergency Communications Network.
The Operations Center maintains 24-hour round the clock emergency communications capabilities, both secure and nonsecure, for selected DOE and NNSA sites and facilities.
# DOE's Continuity of Operations and Continuity of Government program provides minimal Department-wide support to continue functions across a wide range of potential emergencies.
This program further provides support to the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) for it's national security Continuity of Government program.
Performance Indicators # Effective, clear, and comprehensive security strategies and policies for DOE-wide application to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to DOE.
# A secure work environment for Headquarters facilities in the national capital area.
# Specialized activities to protect Departmental facilities, nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and personnel.
Annual Performance Results and Targets FY 2 002 Res ult s A DOE-wide Strategic Plan for Security is in final draft for issuance by 9/30/02.
The Strate gic Plan prepares the Departme nt to better m eet evolving security FY 2003 Targets Rev ise D OE Sec urity S trate gic Plan by 9/30/03 that provides a framework for addressing emerging threats from an existing 10 year to a 25 year period.
FY 2004 Targets Revise Safegu ards an d Secu rity (S
The policy will focus on required outputs as opposed to the specific measures to be employed throughout the
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 119
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
FY 2 002 Res ult s requirements based on threat analysis.
The document's major focus is prote ction o f the na tion's nuclear security assets.
FY 2003 Targets
FY 2004 Targets DOE complex.
Issue revised Design Basis Threat that identified a revised range of Dep artmental threats tha t sites will use in pro viding app ropriate security countermeasures.
Finalize and publish an Annual Assessment of Policy Report that promulgates safeguards and security tec hnologic al solutions to meet priority needs.
Revise DOE Foreign Visit s and Assignments directive to include the D OE ma nda te for all Dep artmental Elements to use the Fore ign A cce ss C entra l T racking System (F ACTS).
Facts will then provide complete and current accountability of foreign visitors and/or assignees throughout the DOE complex.
Revise and publish the DOE Foreign Travel Directive by 9/30/03 to reflect automation of procedures of the Foreign T ravel Management System (FTMS).
FTMS provides DOE managers the ability to review and evaluate foreign travel requests internal to D OE.
All finalized by 9/30/02.
Increased video coverage from 61 to 79 cameras; doubled from 2 to 4 port able e xplo sive d etec tion u nit s; increased armed officers from 55 to 84; increased roving p atrols (24/7) and staffed two additional posts; decreased turnover of officers by implementing an aggressive "officer retention/recognition" program (6/00-5/01 30 officers resigned; 6/01-5/02 only 18 officers resigned); developed and implemented an Emergency Response DOE-wide; equipped and traine d 100% of the Se curity Police Force officers in the application of chemical protective gea r; upg rade d and traine d all Conduct 24 hou rs of manda tory trainin g on u se of forc e for all armed protective force members.
Conduct 12 hou rs of manda tory tactic al and CPR trainin g for all unifo rm ed pe rson nel.
Increase number of trained and armed protective force officers by 5% from 84 to 88.
Secur ity Police Forc e will condu ct a minimum of 15 emergency response training exercises per month at both Forrestal and Germantown facilities.
Install pop-up vehicle barriers at the North entrance of Germantown Develop and conduct a customer survey by the end of F Y 2004 to validate and identify new requirements for the Foreign V isit s and Assignments Program.
Review 30% o f all DOE sites to comp are Official Foreign Travel document ation held a t sites to records retained in the FTM S to determine compliance with DOE Foreign Travel Order.
Conduct 24 hou rs of manda tory trainin g on u se of forc e for all armed protective force members.
Conduct 12 hou rs of manda tory tactic al and CPR trainin g for all unifo rm ed pe rson nel.
Increase number of trained and armed Security Police Force officers by 5% from 88 to 93.
Secur ity Police Forc e will condu ct a minimum of 15 emergency response training exercises per month at both Forrestal and Germantown facilities.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Operational Support
Page 120
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
FY 2 002 Res ult s officers with the new DOE Standard handgun. complex.
FY 2003 Targets
FY 2004 Targets
Reinforce vulnerable areas of Germantown perimeter fence line with physica l barriers de signed to reduce the potential of access by unauthorized vehicles.
Reinforce vulnerable areas of Forrestal complex with improved physical ba rriers.
Install pedestrian turnstiles in the main lobby of the Forrestal facility.
Install badge re aders a t all facility access control points.
Install classified/sensitive destruction facility at the Germ antown facility.
Install new badging system at the Forrestal and Germantown facilities.
Update the current badging system and implement a photo visitor badge process.
Incorporate 100% of newly issued security policy changes into HQ Facilities Master Security Plan and reissue that Plan by April 2003.
Increase Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) inspections of personal and Gov ernm ent-o wne d elec tronic equipment per year from 32 to 40, a 25% increase.
Meet 80% of the 7 working day goal in the P ersonn el Secu rity Program Manual for granting and continuing clearances after receipt of completed background investigation s. Meet 80% of the 30 working day goal in the P ersonn el Secu rity Program Manual for mailing interrogatory letters in derogatory cases after receipt of completed background investigation.
Increase Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) inspections of personal and Gov ernm ent-o wne d elec tronic equipment per year from 40 to 44, a 10% increas e. Meet 85% of the 7 working day goal in the P ersonn el Secu rity Program Manual for granting and continuing clearances after receipt of completed background investigation s. Meet 85% of the 30 working day goal in the P ersonn el Secu rity Program Manual for mailing interrogatory letters in derogatory cases after receipt of completed background investigation.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Operational Support
Page 121
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
FY 2 002 Res ult s
FY 2003 Targets Upgrade security training [Nonproliferation and Na tional Sec urity Institute (NNSI)] and education programs to meet challenges created by increas ed sec urity threats.
Analyze numbers of students trained by NNSI course and agency to validate customer requirements.
Complete biannual program reviews of NNSI to assure courses emb race ev er-cha nging se curity requirements.
Develop a Project Management Implement ation Plan and fac ility plan with milestones to achieve college status with associate and baccalaureate degrees.
Fac ility T ransaction Data reported to Nuclear Materials Measurement and Safeguards System (NMMSS) monthly will have less than 2% errors in initial facility reports.
Require facilities to report T ransaction Data on or before the date specified in the NMMSS Man ual.
Validate data on G overnm entowned nuclear materials, including sealed sources, in NMMSS at nonDOE facilities.
FY 2004 Targets Upgrade security training [Nonproliferation and Na tional Sec urity Institute (NNSI)] and education programs to meet challenges created by increas ed sec urity threats.
Analyze numbers of students trained by NNSI course and agency to validate customer requirements.
Complete biannual program reviews of NNSI to assure courses emb race ev er-cha nging se curity requirements.
Obt ain college status for NNSI as a DOE University accredited with a 2-year degree program.
Fac ility T ransaction Data reported to Nuclear Materials Measurement and Safeguards System (NMMSS) monthly will have less than 1% errors in initial facility reports.
Require facilities to report Inventory Data on or before the date specified in the NMMSS Man ual.
Standardize reporting of nuclear material data elements and terminology by incorporating them into NMMSS and Local Area Network Materials Accounting System (LANM AS).
Impleme nt recomm endations for a newly defined DOE Operations Center.
Modernize Emergency Comm unications System.
Cond uct a co mpr ehens ive study to refocus the Emergency Response Center to a state-of-the-art Operational Center that maintains current information on security and other critical operational conditions of the Departme nt. Provide life-cycle replacement of Emergency Communications Network components and network encryption upgrades.
Maintains support to FEMA required by interagency agreement.
Distribute Continuity of Operations plans to the DOE organizational element s.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Operational Support
Page 122
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
FY 2 002 Res ult s
FY 2003 Targets Finalize development of DOE-wide Continuity of Operations Plans and explore alternate locations.
FY 2004 Targets
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Operational Support
Page 123
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Funding Schedule (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 $ Change % Change Nonproliferation and National Security Institute (NNSI) ..
9,484 4,938 4,814 172 431 11,719 9,498 1,892 7,076 109 50,133 11,984 5,592 4,814 172 431 12,879 13,704 1,932 7,076 169 58,753 12,219 6,852 5,314 172 431 16,709 15,023 2,350 7,076 169 66,315 +235 +1,260 +500 0 0 +3,830 +1,319 +418 0 0 +7,562 +2.0% +22.5% +10.4% 0.0% 0.0% +29.7% +9.6% +21.6% 0.0% 0.0% +12.9% Nuclear Materials Accountability Systems . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Inform ation Sec urity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Safe gua rds a nd S ecu rity A wareness . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Perso nnel Sec urity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Headquarters Security Police Force . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Additiona l Suppor t . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Foreign Visit s, Assignments, and Travel Program DOE O perations Center Continu ity of Opera tions/Co ntinuity of Go vernm ent ......
..... . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
.. .
Total, Operational Support . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 124
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Detailed Pr ogram Justification (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Nonproliferation and National Security Institute (NNSI) ..
9,484 9,421 FY 2003 11,984 11,921 FY 2004 12,219 12,156
# NNSI Operations ................................
NNSI's primary mission is to efficiently and effectively train personnel throughout the DOE complex, as well as from other federal, state, local and international agencies that are involved in the protection of national security assets.
NNSI has grown from one academy focused on Safeguards and Security to five academies providing training and education services and support in response to national requirements.
The NNSI focus in FY 2004 is to transition from a DOE Training Center of Excellence into a college/university level degree-granting institution that supports the DOE mission.
Short-term initiatives include: identify program requirements for the establishment of an associate and baccalaureate degree program; design and develop the program of studies and delivery options for required study disciplines; develop technology and communication capability to become a premier broadcast and distance-learning center; expand the DOE Federal Security Professional Development program to recruit interns and incumbent personnel to meet security workforce needs; and continue training support for new hire Basic Security Police Officers and specialized training for field activities.
# NNSI Equipment ................................
Funding will be used to upgrade NNSI's distance learning equipment.
Nuclear Mat erials Acco untabili ty Systems ..............
63
63
63
4,938 3,900
5,592 4,332
6,852 4,402
# Nuclear Mat erials Man agement and Safeguar ds System (NMMSS) Op erational Program ...................
NMMSS is the national nuclear materials database, which also serves as the official nuclear material accounting system for DOE.
It tracks and analyzes U.S. and foreign nuclear material activity to satisfy statutory requirements and international obligations.
Funding will support normal oper ation and m aintenance of the system; NMMSS sof tware upgrade s to track fo reign obligatio ns in accord ance with U. S. treatie s and agreemen ts for coope ration wit h foreign governments; develop baseline inventory for U.S. nuclear material using NMMSS data; and evaluate feasibility of tracking additional materials using the capabilities of NMMSS.
Increased funding provides the capability to index and scan into an electronic repository historical NMMSS records that are the official record of all exports and imports of nuclear material between 1950 and 1978.
Some of these records are over 40 years old, are kept on paper, and are becoming illegible.
This effort will ensure that future data searches can occur quicker and will ensure that this historical data is available in the future.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 125
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 1,060 FY 2004 1,830
# Local Area Network Materials A ccounting System (LANMAS) .....................................
1,038 Funding level provides for operation and maintenance of 12 LANMAS sites and for minimal integration of new software technology enhancements to prevent obsolescence.
Increased funding supports the integration of limited new software technologies and advanced architectures to improve capabilities and overt obsolescence.
Also, this funding supports further development of a computer-based module for collecting and maintaining measurement data.
These enhancements are critical to meeting complex-wide standardization and improved information management goals.
This application supports all basic material control and accounting records and reporting functions required by DOE domestic and international policy.
LANMAS serves as the foundation for development of the LANMAS Bridge, a prototype browser-based software application or software tool designed for the interactive display of detailed nuclear material inventory information.
# LANMAS Bridge ..............
..................
0
200
620
Funding completes prototype development efforts of the LANMAS Bridge, including deployment of the application, consolidation of complex-wide data, and timely implementation at Headquarters.
The LANMAS Bridge is a prototype browser-based software application (or software tool) designed for the interactive display of detailed nuclear material inventory information.
Implementation of the Bridge allows for timely access, review, and analysis of large volumes of nuclear material data at Headquarters.
This information will be used to respond to emergency and routine nuclear material data inquiries.
Information Security ..............
..................
4,814 1,602 4,814 1,602 5,314 1,602
# Information Security Resource Center (ISRC) .......
The ISRC provides technical expertise and training in an integrated manner across the five disciplines of information security; personnel security; nuclear materials control and accountability; program, planning and management; and protection program operations to maintain ongoing efforts to prevent unauthorized disclosure or compromise of classified information throughout DOE.
This activity does not include cyber security functions.
Activities support the identification of, inquiry into, and resolution of security problems across the Department - specifically in the area of unauthorized disclosures and compromises of classified information; analysis of incidents; facility survey information to identify problems within the infor matio n secu rity pr ogram ; and a nalysi s of Fo reign Owner ship, Cont rol or Influe nce (FO CI) data.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 126
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 1,600 FY 2004 2,100
# Informati on Securit y Protection Pr ogram (ISPP) .....
1,600
The Information Security Protection Program (ISPP) provides technical support to Departmental entities in the area of information security to include vulnerability testing, design reviews to support the complex-wide Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) program, independent verification and validation of information security measures, TSCM equipment inspection support to international treaties, and awareness updates on emerging information security issues.
The ISPP also develops Operations Security (OPSEC) tools for analyses of DOE public web-sites and associated information in order to identify and prevent access to information that could be used in a harmful way against the United States.
Funding also provides maintenance and upgrades for the e-FOCI data base, which allows a contractor to submit foreign ownership, control or influence packages electronically, facilitating a data base of information that assists DOE in their investigation of foreign owned contractors working on classified information or special nuclear material contracts.
The increased funding in FY 2004 will accelerate the development of analytical tools used to determine whether foreign individuals or countries are using multiple contract vehicles within the DOE procurement environment to gain unauthorized access to classified information or special nuclear material.
# Information Assurance and Computer Forensics .....
1,450
1,450
1,450
Activities include continuing the computer forensics capability that support investigations and prosecutions of unauthorized disclosures of classified information.
Funding also supports new technology training and the implementation of first responder training for the Department.
# Technical Support ...............................
162
162
162
Provides for technical expertise to the Headquarters security policy staff in the areas of program planning, safeguards and security systems and risk management.
Safeguards and Security Awareness ....................
172 172 172
Provides DOE-wide security information through the management and maintenance of the Security Education Special Interest Group (SE/SIG) and its electronic bulletin board.
Personnel Security ..................................
431 431 431
Ope rat e Ce nte r fo r Hu man Rel iab ili ty Studies that supports personnel security activities through: personnel security materials revisions; assistance in the development of a new Human Reliability Program (HRP); development of the requirements for HRP implementation as it relates to medical, psychological, legal, security, and management components; maintenance and distribution of a Personnel Security Assurance Program training materials; development and promulgation of new HRP initial/refresher training materials; and serving as technical liaison with Department of Defense (DoD) Personnel Security Research Center, DoD, Polygraph Institute and similar agencies and institutions.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 127
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Headquarters Security Police Force ....................
11,719 11,219 FY 2003 12,879 12,379 FY 2004 16,709 15,209
# Facility Security ................................
Ensure a sound protection program is offered to Headquarters employees and facilities through use of 55 stationary guard posts and roving patrols, 22 supervisors, 4 managers, and 6 instructors, receptionists and administrative assistants, weapons and ammunition manager, quality assurance, and badging personnel.
FY 2004 increase covers additional security expenses associated with the consolidation and relocation of office space for approximately 250 employees at 955 L'Enfant Plaza and supports costs associated with an escalation factor in the contract.
# Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) Program .......................................
500 500 1,500 Support a Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) program to ensure and enhance the security provided for selected DOE and DOE contractor facilities.
Detect and deny the efforts of hostile intelligence or industrial espionage collection operations to penetrate sensitive installations in order to steal techn ology, sensitive or classified information.
Conduct technical surveys, inspections, in-conference monitors, preconstruction consultation services, and provide technical threat analysis at DOE/Headquarters and DOE contractor facilities in the greater Washington, DC areas.
FY 200 4 funding su pports the acquisiti on of new per sonnel and essential new technol ogy TSCM equipment to provide critical security support throughout the Headquarters complex, including Capitol Hill.
Additional Support .................................
9,498 700 13,704 700 15,023 950
# Safeguards and Security Information Management System (SSIMS) .................................
Support operational and basic maintenance costs for SSIMS which tracks and reports classified S
FY 2004 funding will provide for a classified secure Internet accessible list of facility security offices for the more than 2,000 cleared DOE facilities and a list of classified mailing addresses for the over 500 facilities that are authorized to receive classified matter.
FY 2004 funding will provide for the enhancement of a classified secure Intranet web based browser version of the SSIMS application, permit replacement of existing hardware, enhanced analytical software capabilities, and support requisite licensing, in order to support program office and field requests.
# Alarm/Protective Force Radio Sy stems ..............
1,325
1,325
1,325
Funds provide support and corrective/preventive maintenance of the Security Alarm and Access Control Systems (SAACS), magnetometers, 14 x-ray and metal detector machines, and protective force radio systems.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 128
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 2,358 FY 2004 2,818
# Risk Management/Vulnerability Assessment .........
1,858
Provide risk management, vulnerability assessment, and safeguards and security system perfo rmanc e eval uatio ns, ve rific ation s, and valid ation s. FY 2 004 fu nding suppo rts th e Phas e II implementation of the revised DOE standard vulnerability assessment tool suite.
The standardized DOE vulnerability assessment tool set allows the Department to accurately and equitably evaluate the safeguards and security (S
It also provides for onsite participation and field assistance for the most critical facilities' Site S
The onsite support and field assistance provides independent, technical experts to ensure comprehensive, equitable, cost-effective S
Support Joint Tactical Simulation/Joint Conflict and Tactical Simulation modeling, force-on-force exercise expert adversary teams, facility safeguards and security system and program characterization, threat clarification and identification, physical security system reviews, and S
The increased funding in FY 2004 provides support for enhanced blast-effects modeling, cost-benefit model enhancement and data sharing with the Phase II vulnerability assessment tool suite, enhancing the system-effectiveness characterization statistical tools, and additional threat characterization.
# Technical Support for Physical Security Policies and Programs ....................
..................
262 262 262 Funds provide technical support for: the development of standards and procedures for the implementation of smart cards for physical access control; development of physical security systems policy; advice and assistance on adversary's timeline tools; review of physical security systems technical guidance documents; development of physical security systems training for the Central Training Academy; guidance on explosive detection systems and procedures, performance evaluation of the integrated alarm management and control systems; assistance in hosting technical workshops.
# Nuclear/Biological/Chemical Weapons (NB C) Protection Equipment, Training, and Chemical/Biological Detection Equipment ............................
1,829 1,629 1,629
In response to U.S. Policy on Counterterrorism, provide a counterterrorist capability to detect, assess and protect Departmental facilities, employees and the environment from adversarial use of NBC as a weapon of mass destruction (WMD).
FY 2004 reflects the funding necessary to complete detection and assessment capabilities of NBC agents across the DOE complex, including testing and implementation of chemical protective mask communications equipment.
Funding level is based upon field analysis and testing, and equipment modifications to detect potential NBC events.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 129
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 200 FY 2004 200
# Nondestructive Assay (NDA) Standards .............
200
Maintain and revise measurement control standards for safeguards NDA systems to ensure that consistent results are obtained from various NDA techniques (gamma spectrometry, calorimetry, and neutron multiplicity) in the measurements of special nuclear materials.
This effort continues to ensure DOE's nuclear materials accounts are based on defensible measured values.
# Equipment .....................................
2,896
6,793
6,793
Funds supports: Capitalized computer equipment requirements and modifications or replacement parts to the Headquarters Security Alarm and Access Control Systems (SAACS); replacement or upgrade of measurement instruments and equipment at the New Brunswick Laboratory (NBL) to maintain a capability that is state-of-the-art; Headquarters security upgrades such as security screening (x-ray/magnetometer equipment), vehicle inspection scanning devices, low-light closed circuit TV monitoring, radiation/chemical/biological detection devices, access controls, and maintenance of current and upgraded security enhancement equipment.
This effort complies with recommended Department of Justice security upgrades at federal facilities.
# New Brunswick Laboratory (NBL) - Study of Facility Options ........................................
0 0 600 This funding will support planning for a new facility for NBL.
The NBL is housed in an old, deteriorating facility that is impacting the Laboratory's functions and mission capabilities.
# New Brunswick Laboratory Waste Disposal .........
428
437
446
Provides funds for the cost of radioactive waste processing, shipping, and storage which had previously been provided by DOE's Office of Science.
Foreign Visits, Assignments, and Travel (FVAT) Program .
1,892 1,932 2,350
The FVAT program develops policies and implements operational programs to manage the security dimension s of DOE's in teractions with forei gn national s visitin g or assigned t o DOE sites , foreign nationals sponsored by DOE for scientific, technical, or administrative assignments with DOE programs; and DOE sponsored official foreign travel in support of DOE program objectives.
FY 2004 funds support the operation, enhancement, and upgrade of the foreign Access Central Tracking system; provi de support to Homelan d Security requ irements, including a ccountabil ity for exchan ge visitors sponsored by DOE; and continuation of the Foreign Interactions Training Academy at the Nonproliferation and National Security Institute.
The increase in funding supports the operation, enhancement, and upgrade of the Foreign Travel Management System whose responsibility was transferred to the Office of Security.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 130
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 DOE Operations Center .............................
7,076 FY 2003 7,076 FY 2004 7,076
The Emergency Communications Network configuration is based on an asynchronous transfer mode net wor k wi th m ult ipl e al ter nat e pat hs a mon g six pri mar y hub s. F ift y T-1 circuits connect the hubs and provide the bandwidth required for the network backbone.
Individual T-1 circuits connect 32 remote sites to six hubs.
# Funding will also maintain the Forrestal Operations Center and the Germantown Alternate Operations Center.
These activities include: operations of a 24 hour a day HQ Watch Office, which serves as the Department's HQ point-of-contact; operation of the ECN; an Executive Team Room and other Team Rooms which provide emergency facilities for classified/unclassified operations with an uninterrupted power supply and generator backup.
Two rooms at the Forrestal Operations Center are cleared Sensitive Compartmented Information Facilities (SCIF) and support emergency related activities at the Special Compartmented Information level.
Funding included for the Energy Infrastructure Assessment Program.
Continuity of Operations/Continuity of Government .....
109 169 169
Funding for DOE's share of facility rent, maintenance, communications needs, and a redesign effort required by an interagency agreement with FEMA.
Total, Operational Support ..........................
50,133 58,753 66,315
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 131
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Explanation of Funding Changes FY 2004 vs. FY 2003 ($ 000) Nonproliferation and National Security Institute (NNSI) # NNSI Operations - funding supports costs associated with a mandatory small minority business requirement established by the Small Business Administration ..........
Nuclear Mat erials Acco untabili ty Systems # Nuclear Materials Management and Safeguards System (NMMSS) - provides the capability to index and scan into an electrical repository historical NMMSS records that are paper kept and becoming illegible ..................................
# Local Area Network Materials Accounting System (LANMAS) - supports minimal integration of limited new software technologies and advanced architectures to LANMAS capabilities, avoiding obsolescence, and also supports further development of a computer-based module for collecting and maintaining measurements data ....
# LANMAS Bridge - funding allows completion of prototype development of the Bridge, deployment of the application, consolidation of complex-wide data, and implementation at Headquarters, providing timely access, review, and analysis of large volumes of nuclear material data .....................................
Total, Nuclear Materials Accountability Systems ................................
Information Security # Information Security Protection Program - provides funding for expanding the functionality of the e-Assessment of the Foreign Ownership, Control or Influence initiative by accelerating the development of analytical tools used to determine whether foreign individuals or countries are using multiple contract vehicles within the DOE procurement environment to gain unauthorized access to classified information or special nuclear material.
....................................
Headquarters Security Police Force # Funding increase covers the additional security expenses associated with the relocation of approximately 250 employees at 955 L'Enfant Plaza and built-in contract escalation cost .................................................
# Funding provides for a Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM) program including the acquisition of new personnel and new technology TSCM equipment to provide critical security throughout the Headquarters complex and Capitol Hill ....
Total, Headquarters Security Police Force .....................................
Additional Support # Safeguards and Security Information Management System (SSIMS) - in response to Headquarters program office and field personnel user requests, provide enhanced analytical software capabilities and licenses for the SSIMS program.
.............
+235
+70
+770
+420 +1,260
+500
+2,830
+1,000 +3,830
+250
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Security/Operational Support
Page 132
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
FY 2004 vs. FY 2003 ($ 000)
# Risk Management/Vulnerability Assessment - additional funding provides enhanced modeling of blast effects, cost-benefit model enhancement and data sharing with the Phase II vulnerability assessment tool suite allowing DOE to accurately evaluate the safeguards and security protection posture across the complex, enhancement of the system-effectiveness characterization statistical tools, and additional threat characterization.
......................................................
# New Brunswick Laboratory - funding supports the study phase for facility options # New Brunswick Laboratory - increased funding to provide for radioactive waste processing and disposal costs ............................................
Total, Additional Support ..................................................
Foreign Visits, Assignments, and Travel (FVAT) Program # Provides full support to the Foreign Travel Management System which approves and tracks official foreign travel to assure accountability.
..........................
Total Funding Change, Operational Support ....................................
+460 +600 +9 +1,319
+418 +7,562
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Operational Support
Page 133
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Page 134
Technology and Systems Development Mission Supporting Goals and Objectives The mission of the Technology and Systems Development Program (TSDP) is to rapidly develop, identify, evaluate, and leverage technology solutions that enhance the operational capability of our security forces to meet emerging threat scenarios.
The TSDP focuses on Security Forces, Material Control and Accounting, and Physical Security to ensure that nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and key DOE facilities and personnel are adequately protected from traditional threats, including explosives and armed terrorists as well as new or evolving threats including chemical/biological agents, other weapons of mass destruction, and threats posed by the insider.
The TSDP supports activities associated with implementing Presidential Decision Directive (PDD) 39, Counterte rrorism Po licy; PDD 62, C ombating Terrorism; and PDD 63, Critical Infrastructure Protection.
The technology solutions provide the user an effective and cost efficient means to protect against a variety of malevolent events, including terrorist attacks, theft of nuclear weapons and special nuclear materials, and radiological sabotage.
The program continues to utilize core security technologies and expertise in providing sound and innovative technical defenses against such grave concerns as chemical and biological agents, explosives, directed energy weapons and insiders who possess the knowledge and capability to make weapons of mass destruction, have direct access to special nuclear materials, or have the means for inducing other significant harm to DOE and national security.
This program's products and solutions are used not only by DOE, but also by the international community, commercial industry, state and local governments, and other federal agencies.
The program analyzes, develops, and investigates technologies that enable:
# Rapid deployment of advanced solutions that enhance the ability of DOE security forces to respond # # # # # to emerging threats.
This is primarily accomplished by leveraging technologies developed by other federal agencies or commercial companies.
Prompt threat scenarios recognition such as theft of a nuclear weapon, radiological sabotage, loss of highly classified information, etc.
Attacks to be countered without causing undue collateral damage.
DOE to reduce its adversaries' "element of surprise" through systems, improved tactics, and increased early identification of sophisticated attacks.
Reduced requirements for personnel as the primary response and improved responder capability in all situations.
Knowledge and authoritative decisions for security system design and planning that make use of proven modeling techniques and performance information that is comprehensive, accurate, and statistically significant.
This program is organized according to the following security disciplines: Physical Security - Activities are focused on technological solutions for known or discovered vulnerabilities and operational deficiencies, performance and vulnerability testing, protective force enhancement, and participation in federal interagency research and development groups.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Technology and
Page 135
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Material Control and Accounting - Efforts are focused on nuclear material measurements, measurement standardization, performance testing, nuclear material surveillance and control, and providing technical support to DOE facilities to resolve complex measurement issues and ensuring the proper operation of measurement instrumentation.
Information Security - Activities were concentrated on development of automated tools and methods for preventing unauthorized access to or use of sensitive and classified information.
This program was discontinued in FY 2004 as the automated information security function was transferred to the Office of the Chief Information Officer.
Performance Indicators # Innovative technology solutions that assist DOE facilities in selecting and deploying appropriate protection measures to mitigate validated safeguards and security vulnerabilities.
Annual Performance Results and Targets FY 2 002 Res ult s FY 2003 Targets Demonstrate a positive return on investment of at least 90% for the Technology and Systems Development Program (TSDP) projects scheduled for completion in FY 2003.
The 90% return on investment is measured by an acceptable product and/or transfer of product to private industry for commercialization.
FY 2004 Targets Reduce the Technology and Systems Development Program (TSD P) proje ct duration from 2.6 years to 2.2 years to assist in more timely implement ation of technological solutions for documented user needs.
90% of the TSDP projects will me et or e xce ed pr ojec t delive rable and cost schedules.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Technology and
Page 136
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Funding Schedule (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 $ Change % Change Physical S ecurity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Material Control and Accounting . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Infor ma tion S ecu rity . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
.. . . . .
Total, Technology and Systems Development . . . . . . . .
14,972 8,954 2,044 25,970 13,484 8,873 200 22,557 14,041 6,883 0 20,924 +557 -1,990 -200 -1,633 +4.1% -22.4% -100.0% -7.2%
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Technology and
Page 137
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Detailed Pr ogram Justification (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 Physical Security .....................................
14,972 13,484 14,041 # Physical Security Technological Solutions .............
10,992 7,528 9,802 Evaluate or develop countermeasures to known vulnerabilities for security equipment and systems.
Assess or develop protective measures such as activated barriers to prevent access or damage to sensitive DOE facilities.
Provide technical support and information to those who ensure that protective force personnel are adequately equipped to survive and respond to new or evolving threats.
Specific examples include enhancements to body armor, fighting positions, and armored veh icl es. Rel ease Adv ers ary Time-Line Analysis System (ATLAS) Version 3.0 which will provide the capability to model a complete violent and non-violent insider scenarios.
Provide an advanced security display and control system that would integrate site security response systems to other critical communication systems such as fire and rescue.
Analyze advanced technologies such as video segmentation and tracking of multiple people within a volume of space; a modular chemically hardened shelter; and technology solutions to detect and protect against directed energy weapons.
The increase is to evaluate or develop advanced security concepts/solutions that can be quickly implemented throughout the DOE complex.
(SNLA, LLNL, Special Technologies Laboratory, ORN L, Re mot e Se nsi ng La bor ato ry)
# Performance Testing ...............................
2,000 4,473 2,900 Conduct performance testing of security equipment such as interior and exterior sensors, biometrics (e.g., hand geometry, fingerprint scan, iris scan, etc.) and entry control, explosives detection, video assessment, access delay, protective force equipment, communication systems, ammunition, and chem ica l age nt p rot ect ion equ ipm ent , et c., so t hat the tes t da ta c an b e us ed b y ATLAS and Joint Tactical Simulation (JTS) modeling tools for vulnerability analysis, and by DOE field users that must make acquisition and operational application decisions.
Funding is being decreased to allow increased efforts in the development of countermeasures to known vulnerabilities in security equip ment.
(SNLA, LLNL, ORN L) # Technical Support Working Group ...................
1,500 1,035 891 Provide subject matter experts and the full capabilities of DOE laboratories to support the counterterrorism community's Technical Support Working Group, which helps DOE leverage over $50M of interagency research and development activities, specify and coordinate security technology requirements, and provide program input to a significant DoD and counter terrorism investment.
Funding is being decreased to allow increased efforts in the development of count ermea sures to kno wn vul nerab ilit ies to DOE se curit y equip ment.
(SNLA, LLNL)
# Capital Equipment .................................
480 448 448 Provides funding for the purchase of commercial physical security systems (sensors, biometrics, video, etc. ) for perform ance testin g.
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Technology and
Page 138
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 Material Control and Accounting (MC
8,954 8,873 6,883 # Special Nuclear Material Measurement Technologies ....
7,140 6,112 3,349 Evaluate or develop and field nondestructive assay technologies to cost effectively measure DOE's nuclear material inventory.
Expand measurement capabilities to new material types (neptunium237, americium-241 and uranium-233) and difficult-to-measure matrices that are created from nuclear material stabilization, disposition, processing, and the disassembly of nuclear weapons.
Evaluate or develop techniques that improve measurement accuracy thus providing greater accountability of DOE's nuclear assets and preventing unnoticed theft or diversion of small amounts of nuclear material.
Activities include computer software that can measure recently separated and down-blended U-233; an assay technique for plutonium that is moderately enriched in Pu-238; enhancement of the active multiplicity technique so that it can be utilized as a useful method to measure highly enriched uranium; and a large calorimeter capable of measuring enriched uranium or plutonium in 55 gallon shipping containers.
In FY 2004, the decrease represents a reallocation of program activities between this category and the new category, Performance Testing and Technology Assistance, as well as a reduction to the Technology and Systems Development Progr am.
(LA NL, LLNL)
# Special Nuclear Material Control Technologies .........
800 1,659 1,250 Evaluate or develop new components and systems for detection, surveillance, and control of special nuclear materials (SNM).
Activities include the requirements of an active neutron interrogation package monitor to search equipment and containers leaving a facility for shielded SNM; technologies to monitor active vaults; miniature, inexpensive sensors that can provide real-time isotopic information to confirm the presence of SNM; and a radiation monitor that can rapidly discern SNM from medical isotopes when exiting a facility.
The reduction reflects the completion of a project that focused on confirming the presence of SNM in storage via various attributes such as weight, radiation, etc.
(LLNL, LANL, OR/BWXT) # Performance Testing and Technology Assistance ........
0 0 1,795 Test and evaluate new commercial radiation detectors and electronics to suggest improvements to vendors and provide procurement guidance to the DOE facilities.
Provide technical guidance and assistance to DOE facili ties to resolve compl ex technical problems .
Prepare an MC
Publish an updated nondestructive assay manual that serves as the reference book for all DOE sites measuring SNM.
These types of activities were originally included under the Nuclear Materials Measurement category and were s epara ted th is year t o bett er def ine th e acti viti es occ urrin g unde r this disci plin e. (LAN L, LLNL)
# Nuclear Material Accounting ........................
650 613 0 All efforts in support of developing a standardized material accounting system have been transferred to operational support.
(SR)
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Technology and Systems Development
Page 139
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004
# Capital Equipment .................................
364 489 489 Provides funding for the purchase of electronics, software, and commercial non-destructive assay equipment to evaluate or develop improved measurement devices as well as test and evaluate currently available commercial technologies.
Information Security .................................
2,044 200 0 # Automated Information Security Tools ................
2,044 0 0 Evaluate advanced technologies that prevent unauthorized access to or use of DOE's information asset s. (LLNL, LANL) # Technical Analysis and Support .....................
0 200 0 Technical support is provided to the DOE sites as new products are released under Automated Info rma tio n Se curi ty Tools.
(LLNL) Total, Technology and Systems Development ..............
25,970 22,557 20,924
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Technology and Systems Development
Page 140
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Explanation of Funding Changes FY 2004 vs. FY 2003 ($000)
# Physical Security · Funding provides for evaluation of rapid solutions to known security priorities ..
· Funding decrease is to support increased efforts in the evaluation or development of physical security technological solutions ..............................
· Shift within physical security from Technical Support Working Group to technological solutions ..............................................
Tota l, P hysi cal Sec uri ty ....................................................
# Material Control and Accounting (MC
· Reduction to special nuclear mat erial (SNM) control is the result of complet ing a project foc used on conf irming the p resence of SN M in storage ...............
· Performance Testing and Technology Assistance category was developed to support SNM measurements activities ...................................
· Decrease in material accounting systems due to completion of activities .......
Total, Mate rial Contr ol and Accou nting .......................................
+2,274 -1,573 -144 +557
-2,763 -409 +1,795 -613 -1,990
# Information Security · Funding for information security activities is eliminated as the automated information security function was transferred to the Office of the Chief Information Officer .................................................
Total Funding Change, Technology and Systems Development .....................
-200 -1,633
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Technology and
Page 141
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Page 142
Classification/Declassification Resources Mission Supporting Goals and Objectives The Department of Energy (DOE) has a unique, statutorily based responsibility to implement the Government-wide program to classify and declassify nuclear weapons-related technology (classified as Restricted Data).
DOE is also responsible for implementing the requirements contained in Executive Order 12958 to classify and declassify other information that is critical to the national security (classified as National Security Information).
To fulfill these responsibilities, the mission of the Classification/Declassification program is to develop (1) Government-wide policies and technical guidance to identify nuclear weapons-related information that warrants protection and (2) DOE-wide policies and guidance to identify other information that is critical to protecting the national security.
This critical program is a cornerstone of the United States nuclear nonproliferation and security program since an asset cannot be protected until it is identified as requiring protection.
Consistent with this mission, the Classification/Declassification program funds support service contractors at Headquarters and management and operating contractors in the field who provide highly technical support through: · Assisting in the development of general policies, procedures, and guidance to ensure that classified and controlled information is identified consistently by personnel within the Department and other Government agencies.
Conducting appraisals of DOE, including NNSA, organizations and visits to other Government agencies to ensure they are conforming with these policies, procedures, and guidance.
Assisting in the development of detailed technical classification and control guidance to identify information that requires protection in the interest of the national security.
Developing and conducting training within the Department and for other agencies to ensure that personnel identify and protect sensitive nuclear weapon design information and other national security information.
Conducting classification and declassification reviews and audits of documents required under statute (e.g., Atomic Energy Act, P.L. 105-261, Freedom of Information Act, etc.) and Executive Order (e.g., E.O. 12958) to prevent adversaries from acquiring weapons of mass destruction or damaging the nation's energy infrastructure.
Developing state-of-the-art technology to enhance the classification and declassification process, making it more efficient and effective.
·
·
·
·
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security/ Classification/Declassification
Page 143
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Performance Indicators # Specialized activities to protect Departmental facilities, nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and personnel.
Annual Performance Results and Targets FY 2 002 Res ult s FY 2003 Targets Examination of 5 million (out of 22 millio n) p ages of National Archives and Records Administration (NARA) document s and rem ove a ll classified document s containing nuclear weapon design and use information to prevent the further compromise of classified or controlled information.
Examine all newly processed NARA document s (up to 2.5 million p ages) and remove all classified document s containing nuclear weapon design and use information.
Review 900,000 pages (o ut of 4.6 millio n) of DO E pe rm ane ntly historical valuable documents and remove all classified document s. Com plete 90 pe rcen t of all requests for classification reviews for removal of classification or controlled information on or before the requested due date.
FY 2004 Targets Examination of 5 million (out of 17 millio n) p ages of NARA document s and remove all classified document s containing nuclear weapon design and use information to prevent the further compromise of classified or controlled information.
Examine all newly processed NARA document s (up to 3.5 million p ages) and remove all classified document s containing nuclear weapon design and use information.
Review 1.0 million pages (out of 3.7 m illion) o f DO E pe rm ane ntly historical valuable documents and remove all classified document s. Com plete 90 pe rcen t of all requests for classification reviews for removal of classification or controlled information on or before the requested due date.
Review 20% of DOE's 72 Headquarters classification guides, completing a review of every guide by FY 2008, to ensure that nuclear weapon design and other classified information is effectively identified throughout Government for protection from inadvertent disclosure to terrorists or nuclear proliferants.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security/ Classification/Declassification
Page 144
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Funding Schedule (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 $ Change % Change Policy and Technical Guidance . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Classification/Declassification . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Classification and Controlled Information T raining ......
Total, Classification/Declassification Resources . . . . . . .
5,128 11,304 683 17,115 5,236 11,541 697 17,474 5,236 11,541 697 17,474 0 0 0 0 0.0% 0.0% 0.0% 0.0%
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security/ Classification/Declassification
Page 145
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Detailed Pr ogram Justification (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Policy and Technical Guidance .........................
5,128 3,128 FY 2003 5,236 3,194 FY 2004 5,236 3,200
#
Classification and Control Guidan ce Program .........
Develop, update and maintain detailed classification/control guides to identify information for protection from proliferants: for the government, under the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, Restricted Data (e.g., sensitive nuclear weapon design information); for the Department, under executive Order, National Security Information (e.g., counterintelligence and chemical/biological information), and; under statute and Presidential Directive, certain Unclassified Controlled information (e.g., Unclassified Controlled Nuclear Information, Sensitive Homeland Security Information).
Continue to improve the classification guidance system through the Guidance Streamlining Initiative, making guidance more accurate, clear, and useable for guide writers and classifiers throughout the complex.
#
Policy and Quality Ma nagement Pr ogram ............
2,000
2,042
2,036
Develop and promulgate overarching government-wide policies (e.g., regulations) and department-wide policies (e.g., orders and manuals) to ensure that both classified and unclassified controlled information critical to the nation's security is identified for proper protection.
To ensure DOE and government classification and control programs provide the proper tools to identify critical information: conduct appraisals of all DOE/NNSA classification and control programs; conduct quality assistance visits of other-agency RD and Formerly Restricted Data (FRD) classification/declassification programs under 10 CFR Part 1045; and conduct quality assurance reviews of other agencies to prevent the inadvertent release of documents containing RD and FRD under P.L. 105-261.
Appraisals and quality assurance/assistance visits also serve as a mechanism for gauging the effectiveness of current policies, resulting in policy adjustments as necessary.
Classification/Declassification ..........................
11,304 8,505 11,541 9,086 11,541 9,320
#
Classification/Declassification Reviews ...............
Perform classification reviews under the requirements of the Atomic Energy Act, E.O. 12958, and P.L. 105-261 to prevent proliferation of weapons of mass destruction by reviewing documents before they are made available to the public, to ensure that no classified or controlled information is compromised; and by examining documents that have already been made available to the public, to ensure that if they contain classified/controlled information, they are withdrawn and not further disseminated.
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security/ Classification/Declassification
Page 146
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004
In FY 2004, DOE will review approximately 100,000-150,000 pages of documents potentially releasable under the Freedom of Information Act; E.O. 12958, Section 3.6, Mandatory Review; litigation discovery responses; and newly written DOE documents.
Declassified documents will be listed/published on DOE's Internet website.
Additionally, DOE will examine in detail approximately 5,000,000 pages of historical documents embedded with RD and FRD that were decl ass ifi ed b y oth er go vern men t age nci es u nde r E. O. 1 295 8, s ect ion 3.4 , be for e th e pag e-bypage review requirement of P.L. 105-261 was enacted; and quality control examine up to another 3,500,000 pages of historical documents that were declassified after the page-by-page review requirement of P.L. 105-261 was enacted.
Additionally, DOE will examine over 1,000,000 pages of its own historical records for declassification under E.O. 12958, Section 3.4.
#
Document Declassification Technology Development ...
1,200
700
466
Develop, implement and test application of state-of the art technology for document declassification to reduce costs and improve effectiveness in preventing inadvertent compromises of classified and controlled information.
This effort is being funded at a reduced level with more emphasis on evaluating the application of, and determining cost benefit from, recently developed technology.
#
Automation Programs .............................
1,599
1,755
1,755
Develop, enhance and maintain automation systems to support classification reviews.
These automation systems include: work flow management (e.g. Computerized Action and Tracking System), electronic redaction, training (e.g. Authority and Training Tracking System), and classification reviewing tools (e.g. Reviewers' Electronic Library and knowledge preservation).
Classification and Controlled Information Training ........
683 697 697
Develop and produce policy and technical training materials on classification and controlled information for Department-wide use; conduct training for Departmental classification managers, classifiers, declassifiers, and unclassified controlled nuclear weapons information reviewing officials who are responsible for identifying sensitive information that must be protected for national security reasons.
Develop and conduct Congressionally mandated, government-wide training of other agency personnel to ensure that they can identify and protect sensitive nuclear weapon information and prevent its inadvertent public release.
This other government training is mandated by 10 CFR Part 1045, Nuclear Classification and Declassification, and P.L. 105-261.
Total, Classification/Declassification Resources ............
17,115 17,474 17,474
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security/ Classification/Declassification
Page 147
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Explanation of Funding Changes FY 2004 vs. FY 2003 ($000) Classification/Declassification # Classification/Declassification Reviews Provides support to the Internet website which houses declassified documents .....
# Document Declassification Technology Development Emphasis is shifted to evaluating the application and cost benefit received from rece ntl y dev elo ped tec hno logy ..........................................
Total Funding Change, Classification/Declassification Resources ...................
+234
-234 0
Other Defense Activities/Security/ Nuclear Safeguards and Security/ Classification/Declassification
Page 148
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Capital Operating Expenses and Construction Summary
FY 2002 Total, Capit al Equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
3,896
$ FY 2003 FY 2004 Change % Change 7,793 7,793 0 0.0%
Other Defense Activities/Security/Nuclear Safeguards and Security/Capital Operating truction Summary
Page 149
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Page 150
Security Investigations Program Mission The Security Investigations Program funds background investigations for all Department of Energy (DOE) Federal employees and contractors who, in the performance of their official duties, require access authorizations for Restricted Data, National Security Information, or certain quantities of special nuclear material.
Security Investigations are required in order to be in compliance with Section 145 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended; Title 10, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 710; and Executive Order 12968.
The Department is required to utilize either the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) or Office of Personnel Management (OPM) as a source of personnel security investigations.
Program Strategic Performance Goal CM5-1: Develop policies and strategies to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to the Department of Energy (DOE), deploy technological solutions to enhance security, protect Headquarters personnel and facilities, and provide other specialized security activities.
Performance Indicator Specialized activities to protect Departmental facilities, nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and personnel.
Annual Performance Results and Targets FY 200 2 Res ults Conduct approximately 22,756 personnel security investigations and reinvestigations for the Dep artment of Energy.
FY 2003 Targets Conduct approximately 22,475 personnel security investigations and reinvestigations for the Dep artment of Energy.
FY 2004 Targets Conduct approximately 24,743 personnel security investigations and reinvestigations for the Dep artment of Energy.
Significant Program S hifts # # The price of investigative products has increased approximately 3% a year due to a rise in operating costs.
In order to ensure that the number of access authorizations (personnel security clearances) is consistent with mission requirements, the number of "Q" access authorizations has gradually increased since FY 2001 and is expected to continue rising due to heightened security requirements following September 11, 2001, and DOE's revised Design Basis Threat.
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 151
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
·
In response to heightened security concerns (Post 9/11), the DOE complex will continue increasing the number of Security Police Officers in FY 2003, thereby creating a need for more initial investigation funding.
#
In FY 2004, the "Q" reinvestigation workload is projected to be significantly higher (approximately 2,422 cases) than budgeted for in FY 2003 due to the cyclical surge in the fiveyear reinvestigation requirement.
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 152
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Funding Profile (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Comparable Appropriation Estimated Program Distribution National Nuclear Security Administration . .
Defense Environmental Management . . . .
Science . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Security . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Security Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . .
26,122 9,288 1,372 8,145 44,927 26,978 9,027 1,457 8,408 45,870 33,492 10,871 1,724 8,467 54,554 +6,514 +1,844 +267 +59 +8,684 +24.1% +20.4% +18.3% +0.7% +18.9% FY 2003 Request FY 2004 Request
$ Change
% Change
Public Law Authorization: Public Law 83-703, "Atomic Energy Act of 1954"
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 153
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Funding by Site FY 2002 Albuquerque Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Chicago Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Idaho Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Nevada Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Oak Ridge Operations Office Oak Ridge Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Oak Ridge Institute of Science 
. . . . . . . .
Total, Oak Ridge Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Richland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Oakland Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Savannah River Operations Office . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
W ashington Headquarters . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Security Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
2,188 175 2,363 1,807 5,016 3,252 6,955 44,927 22,191 511 733 2,099
a
(dollars in thousands) FY 2003 22,369 454 634 1,731 2,289 185 2,474 1,933 5,072 4,040 7,163 45,870 FY 2004 29,293 613 647 1,921 2,432 185 2,617 2,069 5,712 4,660 7,022 54,554 $ Change +6,924 +159 +13 +190 +143 0 +143 +136 +640 +620 -141 +8,684 % Change +31.0% +35.0% +2.1% +11.0% +6.2% 0.0% +5.8% +7.0% +12.6% +15.3% -2.0% + 18.9%
On Decem ber 20, 2002, the National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA) disestablished the Albuquerque, Oakland, and Nevada Operations Offices, renamed existing area offices as site offices, established a new Nevada Site Office, and established a single NNSA Service Center to be located in Albuquerque.
Other as pe cts of t he NN SA org an izat ion al c ha ng es will b e p ha se d in an d c on so lida tion of t he Se rvic e C en ter in Albuquerque will be completed by September 30, 2004.
For budget display purposes, DOE is displaying nonNN SA bud gets by site in the tradition al pre -NN SA orga nization al form at.
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
a
Page 154
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Site Description Operations Offices The Security Investigations budget provides funding to the personnel security offices to pay for background investigations conducted by the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) and the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) for DOE Federal employees and contractors.
Background investigations are required for personnel who, in the performance of their official duties, require access to classified information or certain quantities of special nuclear material.
The investigation is one of the tools used by DOE security personnel to determine if an individual will receive a DOE access authorization (personnel security clearance).
Washington Headqu arters Headquarters receives funding for background investigations and the associated costs for maintaining the DOE Integrated Safeguards and Security (eDISS+) personnel security databases.
The eDISS+ initiative consists of a set of interrelated databases, associated client applications, and web pages that provide a mechanism to automate the processing and tracking of access authorization requests Department-wide. eDISS+ also allows electronic communications between DOE operations offices, and the transmission of investigative requests from DOE operations offices to the Office of Personnel Management (OPM).
Oak Ridge Op erations Office The Oak Ridge Operations Office receives funding for background investigations and the associated costs for maintaining the DOE Test Center/Accelerated Access Authorization Program (AAAP).
The AAAP expedites the placement of urgently required personnel through processing a "Q" interim access authorization prior to completion of the standard background investigation.
Oak Ridge Institute of Science and Education The Oak Ridge Institute for Science and Education (ORISE), located in Oak Ridge, Tennessee, provides DOE with technical support for conducting research related to the security investigation process including the quality, utility, and completeness of the product.
Funding includes a review of the Department's Accelerated Access Authorization Program (AAAP), other agencies' interim clearance processes, and its relationship to the security investigation process.
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 155
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Albuquerque Operations Off ice The Albuquerque Operations Office receives funding for: Background investigations and for costs to maintain the DOE Test Center/Accelerated Access Authorization Program (AAAP).
The AAAP expedites the placement of urgently required personnel through processing a "Q" interim access authorization prior to completion of the standard background investigation.
Safeguards and S ecurit y Awareness Program, managed through the Nonproliferation and National Security Institute (NNSI), develops and distributes briefing materials as required by the refresher briefing provisions in DOE Order 470.1, Chapter 4.
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 156
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Fund ing Sch edule (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Federal Bureau of Investigation . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Initial Background Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Post-Initial Background Investigations (Reinvestigations) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Federal User Charges . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Federal Bureau of Investigation Office of Personnel Management Initial Background Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Reinvestigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
National Agency Checks . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Office of Personnel Management . . . . . . . . . . .
Related Security Investigations Activities . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Security Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
13,978 16,058 829 30,865 4,100 44,927 17,174 13,122 1,919 32,215 4,855 45,870 19,173 16,468 1,852 37,493 4,855 54,554 +1,999 +3,346 -67 +5,278 0 +8,684 +11.6% +25.5% -3.5% +16.4% 0.0% +18.9% 1,942 7,945 75 9,962 3,069 5,656 75 8,800 3,813 8,318 75 12,206 +744 +2,662 0 +3,406 +24.2% +47.1% 0.0% +38.7% FY 2003 FY 2004 $ Change % Change
Case Projections Category Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) Initial Background Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Post-Initial Background Investigations (Reinvestigations). . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, FBI Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
572 2,970 3,542 877 2,053 2,930 1,059 2,929 3,988 +182 +876 +1,058 +20.8% +42.7% +36.1% FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 # Change % Change
Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Initial Background Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Reinvestigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
National Agency Checks . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, OPM Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Security Investigations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
4,509 9,176 5,529 19,214 22,756 5,540 7,190 6,815 19,545 22,475 6,020 8,736 5,999 20,755 24,743 +480 +1,546 -816 +1,210 +2,268 +8.7% +21.5% -12.0% +6.2% +10.1%
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 157
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Detailed Program Justification (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) .....................
9,962 8,800 12,206 The National Defense Authorization Act for FY 2000 (S.1059, Section 3144) required that Federal and con tra cto r pe rso nne l in hi gh risk po sitions hav e ba ckgrou nd i nve stigations con duc ted by th e FBI.
Personnel in less sensitive positions continue to be investigated by the Office of Personnel Management (OPM).
The FBI product is more expensive due to higher contractor operating costs than the OPM product (12% higher for initial investigations and 34% higher for reinvestigations).
# Initial Investigations .................................
1,942 3,069 3,813 Perform 1,059 initial background investigations, 182 more cases than FY 2003.
The increased funding supports 100% of the validated caseload required to meet mission requirements.
# Post-Initial Background Investigations (Reinvestigations) ..
7,945 5,656 8,318 # Perform 2,929 periodic reinvestigations.
An increase of 876 from the FY 2003 level is a result of the cyclical surge in the five-year reinvestigation requirement.
# Reimburse the FBI for fingerprint cards and name checks .
75 75 75 Office of Personnel Management .........................
30,865 32,215 37,493 Fund background investigations for DOE Federal personnel and contractors who do not require an investigation by the FBI, but require access authorizations for Restricted Data, National Security Information, or certain quantities of special nuclear material.
# Initial Investigations .................................
13,978 17,174 19,173 Perform 6,020 initial (Single Scope Background) investigations, 480 more cases than FY 2003.
The increased funding represents 98% of the validated caseload required to meet mission requirements.
# Reinvestigations ....................................
16,058 13,122 16,468 Perform 8,736 periodic reinvestigations (for Single Scope Background Investigations).
An increase of 1,546 cases over FY 2003 levels is a result of the cyclical surge in the five-year reinvestigation requirement.
# National Agency Checks (NAC's) ....................
829 1,919 1,852 Perform 5,999 NAC's (3,056 initials and 2,943 reinvestigations).
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 158
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 FY 2003 FY 2004 Related Security Investigations Activities ................
4,100 4,855 Costs incurred in implementing security investigations related programs and projects outlined below: # Continue operation and maintenance of the Electronic Transf er Program throughout DOE .................
2,900 3,520 # Continue to support the Accelerated Access Auth oriza tion Program (AAAP) located in Albuquerque and Oak Ridge ................
...................
865 1,000 # Provide support for miscellaneous costs involved in maintaining a viable personnel security program (technical support for conducting research related to security investigations and developing and distributing refresher briefing materials ........................
335 335 Total, Security Investigations ..........................
44,927 45,870 4,855
3,320
1,200
335
54,554
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 159
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Explanation of Funding Changes from FY 2003 to FY 2004 FY 2004 vs. FY 2003 ($000) · Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) · Funding level reflects an increase of approximately 182 initial background investigations from FY 2003 which supports 100% of the validated caseload required to meet mission requirements ..................................
· Funding level reflects an increase of approximately 876 post-initial background investigations (reinvestigations) from FY 2003.
The "Q" reinvestigation workload is projected to be significantly higher due to the five-year reinvestigation requirement..
......................................................
Total, Fed eral Bu reau of Inve stigation ( FBI) ...................................
# Office of Personnel Management (OPM) · Funding level reflects an increase of approximately 480 initial background investigations from FY 2003 which supports 98% of the validated caseload required to meet mission requirements .................................
· "Q" Reinvestigation requirements are estimated to be 1,546 cases higher than in the FY 2003 budget request.
..........................................
· NAC funding supports 816 less cases than in FY 2003 ......................
Total, Office of Personnel Management ......................................
# Related Security Investigations Activities · A decrease in funding to the Electronic Transfer Program is necessary to support the Accelerated Access Authorization Program (AAAP).
The Electronic Transfer Program has fewer software licensing fees due in FY 2004 ..................
· Increased funding to support AAAP is necessary due to the rising cost of conducting polygraphs.
The polygraph fee for service is increasing 77% due to program expenses and the number of man hours it takes to complete a polygraph.
Total, Related Security Investigations Activities ................................
Total Funding Change, Security Investigations .................................
+744
+2,662 +3,406
+1,999 +3,346 -67 +5,278
-200
+200 0 +8,684
Other Defense Activities/Security Security Inv estigations
Page 160
FY 2004 Congressional Budget
Program Direction
Mission Supporting Goals and Measures
Program Direction supports Federal personnel who provide leadership and management in the following Office of Security (SO) mission areas: 1) Nuclear Safeguards and Security, which includes the Nonproliferation and National Security Institute, Nuclear Materials Accountability Systems, Information Security, Security Education Briefings and Awareness Training, Personnel Security, Headquarters Security, Foreign Visits and Assignments, Security Policy, Office of Operations Support and Classification/Declassification; 2) Security Investigations; 3)Direct support in the areas of Executive Protection for the Secretary of Energy and other principals, budget, finance, procurement, human, and information technology; and 4) Program-specific staffing resources at the New Brunswick Laboratory (NBL).
Program Goals # Funds salaries and benefits, travel, support services, and other related expenses for Federal personnel (the latter including the Working Capital Fund) and contractual support associated with the leadership, management, and administration for carrying out the mission of the Office of Security.
Program Objectives # Salaries and Benefits for SO and NBL Federal employees, including overtime, awards, lumpsum leave payments, worker's compensation, transit subsidies, contributions to employee benefits, benefits associated with permanent change of station, and associated cost-of-living increases.
Travel funds are required to carry out SO's and NBL's mission while away from official duty stations.
Ensure per diem allowances, and local travel are in accordance with Federal Travel Regulations.
Travel is an essential part of staff duties in order to conduct hands-on operations both domestically and internationally, participate in highly-technical agency and interagency committees, and to ensure appropriate Government representation in policy meetings.
Support Services contracts provide support to Federal staff at Headquarters and at the New Brunswick Laboratory, at Argonne, Illinois.
These contracts provide technical, analytical, administrative, and operational support in multiple program areas.
The daily operation and associated technical direction of the contracts remain with Federal program managers in each organization.
Other Related Expenses support the administrative costs for 294 Federal employees (Headq uarter s 254 a nd NBL 40) .
Admi nist rativ e cost s incl ude: Inf ormat ion t echno logy expenses, computer and office equipment, telecommunications, training, and publications.
The Working Capital Fund includes goods and services at Headquarters, which include: automated FY 2004 Congressional Budg
#
#
#
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 161
office support, payroll services, communication services, postage, printing and graphics, supplies, copiers, rent, space, and utilities.
Program Strategic Performance Goals CM5-1: Develop policies and strategies to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to the Department of Energy (DOE), deploy technological solutions to enhance security, protect Headquarters personnel and facilities, and provide other specialized security activities.
Performance Indicators # # # Effective, clear, and comprehensive security strategies and policies for DOE-wide application to protect national security and other critical assets entrusted to DOE.
A secure work environment for Headquarters facilities in the national capital area.
Innovative technological solutions resolving validated safeguards and security vulnerabilities to assist DOE facilities in deploying appropriate protection measures for critical assets as defined in the DOE Design Basis Threat.
Specialized activities to protect Departmental facilities, nuclear weapons, special nuclear materials, classified information, and personnel.
#
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 162
FY 2004 Congressional Budg
Annual Perform ance Results and Targets FY 200 2 Res ults Fund S alaries an d benef its, travel, support services, and other related expenses for Federal personnel (the latter including the Working Capital Fund) and contractual support associated with the leadership, management, and administration for carrying out the mission of the Office of Security and the New Brunswick Labora tory.
FY 200 3 Tar gets Fund s alaries an d benef its, travel, support services, and other related expenses for Federal personnel (the latter including the Working Capital Fund) and contractual support associated with the leadership, management, and administration for carrying out the mission of the Office of Security and the New Brunswick Labora tory.
Revise Office of Special Operations policies, procedures, and standards for executive protection.
Ensure all Office of Special Operations executive protection personnel receive training at the Federal Law Enforcement Training Center.
Design a comprehensive Executive Protection training course to train all executive protection personnel emp loyed by D OE. Re-establish the Area Threat Assessment Program by revising policies a nd proc edures for daily operations.
Conduct 4 threat assessments at DOE sites.
Provide 4 executive protective training classes consisting of 24 students each to other armed DOE personnel and non-DOE Federal emp loyees re gularly eng aged in executive protection.
FY 200 4 Tar gets Fund s alaries an d benef its, travel, support services, and other related expenses for Federal personnel (the latter including the Working Capital Fund) and contractual support associated with the leadership, management, and administration for carrying out the mission of the Office of Security and the New Brunswick Labora tory.
Conduct 4 threat assessments at DOE sites.
Provide and update threat warnings, alerts and /or adv isories to appropriate DOE sites.
Provide and update threat warnings, alerts and /or adv isories to appropriate DOE sites.
Ensure DOE is cognizant of threat matters that impact Departmental assets through liais on with loc al, Federal, and state law enforcement agencies.
Revise Office of Special Operations policies, procedures and training standards for criminal investigators.
Complete at least 90 percent of new security incident investigations within 6 months.
Ensure DOE is cognizant of threat matters that impact Departmental assets through liais on with loc al, Federal, and state law enforcement agencies.
Complete at least 90 percent of new security inc ident inv estigations within 6 months.
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 163
FY 2004 Congressional Budg
Page 164
Funding Sche dule (dollars in tho usands, whole FTEs) FY 2002 Chicago Salaries and Ben efits . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Travel . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Support Services . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Other Related Expenses . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Chicago . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Full T ime E quiva lents . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Headq uarters Salaries and Ben efits . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Travel . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Support Services . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Other Related Expenses . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Headquarters . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Full T ime E quiva lents . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total Security Salaries and Ben efits . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Travel . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Support Services . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Other Related Expenses . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Subtotal, Program Direction . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Less Security Charge for Res.
Work . . . . . . . .
Less Prior Year Balances . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Program Direction . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Additional net budget authority to cover the cost of fully accruing retirement (non-add) . . . .
Full T ime E quiva lents . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
28,957 1,549 6,895 12,885 50,286 -712 -4,550 45,024 30,275 1,721 6,922 13,128 52,046 -712 0 51,334 31,017 1,725 6,140 13,608 52,490 -712 0 51,778 +742 +4 -782 +480 +444 +0 +0 +444 +2.5% +0.2% -11.3% +3.7% +0.9% +0.0% +0.0% +0.9% 25,528 1,479 6,758 10,918 44,683 241 26,729 1,650 6,779 11,135 46,293 252 27,347 1,654 5,997 11,259 46,257 254 +618 +4 -782 +124 -36 +2 +2.3% +0.2% -11.5% +1.1% +0.1% +0.8% 3,429 70 137 1,967 5,603 40 3,546 71 143 1,993 5,753 40 3,670 71 143 2,349 6,233 40 +124 +0 +0 +356 +480 +0 +3.5% +0.0% +0.0% +17.9% +8.3% +0.0% FY 2003 FY 2004 $ Change % Change
(1,706) 281
(1,703) 292
(2,168) 294
(+435) (+25.5%) +2 +0.7%
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 165
FY 2004 Congressional Budg
Page 166
Detailed Program Justification (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Salaries and Benefits .......................................
FY 2003 30,275
FY 2004 31,017
28,957
#
228 Federal personnel serve as the Headquarters operational element for safeguards and security policy.
Policy that includes the security training mission at the Nonproliferation and National Security Institute in Albuquerque, New Mexico; plutonium, uranium, and special materials; classification and declassification operations; enhanced foreign visits and assignments; executive protection; headquarters security operations; operations support; the Office of the Director, security investigations and direct support in the areas of budget, finance, procurement, information technology and human and security resources.
Minimal increases provide cost-of-living adjustments, promotions, within-grade increases, lump-sum payments, worker's compensation, and SO's share of costs associated with pension and annuitant health care benefits.
SO is responsible for the salaries and benefits of 40 Federal employees at the New Brunswick Laboratory in Argonne, Illinois.
In FY 2003, the Office of Operations Support functions were transferred from the National Nuclear Security Agency (NNSA)/Emergency Operations to the Office of Security.
This included 26 full time federal personnel to support the functions of the Energy Operations Center and the Continuity of Operations (COOP)/Continuity of Government (COG).
......................................................
# #
Travel
1,549
1,721
1,725
#
Provides funding for domestic and foreign trips necessary to conduct essential security activities.
Domestic travel includes national security assistance and interface with field offices, laboratories and local governments, and the Executive Protection Security personnel for the Secretary of Energy.
...........................................
Support Services
6,895
6,922
6,140
# #
Provides highly specialized technical and analytical expertise and management support personnel essential to the mission success of the Safeguards and Security program.
The funds for the New Brunswick Laboratory provide maintenance of the Laboratory Information Management System.
The system tracks all sensitive materials from the time of arrival to t he sit e to de partu re. Pr ovid es tech nical and ad mini strat ive in forma tion techn ology expertise.
Finances mail room support, travel management, and infrastructure upgrades, which are criti cal d ay-to -day operati on s wit hi n New Brun swick La bo rato ry.
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 167
FY 2004 Congressional Budg
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Other Related Expenses ...................................
FY 2003 13,128 524 516 8
FY 2004 13,608 525 517 8
12,885 514 506 8
#
Training
.............................................
.....................................
Headquarters NBL
.............................................
Provides training funds for the technical and administrative personnel to meet the organizational mission requirements.
#
Other Services
.......................................
.....................................
7,511 5,552 1,959
7,645 5,660 1,985
8,004 5,663 2,341
Headquarters NBL
.............................................
Provides funds for administrative expenses that support the Federal workforce in computer hardware and software acquisitions, commercial time-sharing services, telecommunications, office supplies, publications, subscriptions, and day-to-day items necessary to support the security mission.
The New Brunswick Laboratory funds infrastructure costs for building and ground maintenance; custodial services; environment, safety, and health services to include funding for waste disposal; utility costs; technical information services, health care services, and the campus Fire Department.
#
Working Capital Fund
.............................
4,860
4,959
5,079
Funds mandatory administrative costs, such as automated office support, telephone services, postage, printing and graphics, supplies, copiers, rent, space, utilities, and payroll services.
Payments reflect usage of services which are priced and charged to users in accordance with policies established yearly by the Working Capital Fund Board.
Total, Program Direction ..........
.................
50,286 52,046 52,490
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 168
FY 2004 Congressional Budg
Explanation of Funding Changes
FY 2004 vs. FY 2003
#
Salaries and Benefits Salaries and Benefits increased to fund cost-of-living increases, promotions, within grade increases, lump sum payments, and overtime ($451K HQ, $124K NBL).
Transfer of 4 employees to NNSA (-$15K) ...............
New Hires of two Federal Employees.
(Safety Specialist $75K, Survey Team Member $107K) ...........................................
+560
+182 +742
Total, Salaries and Benefits
#
Travel Travel increased slightly due to transfer of Office of Operations Support ..
+4 +4
Total, Travel
#
Support Services Support Services reduced due higher priority requirements in Program Direction .....................................................
-782 -782
Total, Support Services
#
Other Related Expenses Other services increased slightly due to transfer of operations support ......
Working Capital Fund increased due to escalation costs ................
Reinstatement to New Brunswick Lab for work previously reimbursed at $712K ........................................................
+4 +120
+356 +480
Total, Other Related Expenses
Total Funding Change, Program Direction
+444
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 169
FY 2004 Congressional Budg
Page 170
Support Services
(dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Technical Support Services . . . . . . . .
Management Support Services . . . . .
Total Support Services . . . . . . . . . . . .
4,337 2,558 6,895 FY 2003 4,348 2,574 6,922 FY 2004 4,048 2,092 6,140 $Change -300 -482 -782 % Change -6.9% -18.7% -11.3%
Other Related Expenses (dollars in thousands) FY 2002 Training . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Other Services . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
W orking Capital Fund . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total, Other Related Expenses . . . . .
514 7,511 4,860 12,885 FY 2003 524 7,645 4,959 13,128 FY 2004 525 8,004 5,079 13,608 $ Change +1 +359 +120 +480 % Change +0.2% +4.7% +2.4% +3.7%
Other Defense Activities/Security Program Direction
Page 171
FY 2004 Congressional Budg
Page 172
